The Cantabria first episode schizophrenia study: a summary of general findings.This article describes the general findings of the initial cross-sectional stage of a prospective follow-up study of all first episodes of schizophrenia that occurred in the Autonomous Community of Cantabria over a 2-year period and that established contact with any mental health service. The project comprises: i) a 2-year cross-sectional stage, in which the sample was gathered and studied with structured psychiatric instruments such as the Present State Examination and the Scales for the Assessment of Negative and Positive Symptoms (SANS and SAPS), and; ii) a continuous follow-up. We detected, in the risk age ranged of 15-54 years, an incidence of 1.9 per 10,000 inhabitants per year for schizophrenia and of 1.3 per 10,000 inhabitants per year for the S+ CATEGO diagnosis, without any significant gender difference of morbidity. The mean age for the total schizophrenic population was 26 years, being significantly higher in women than in men. In contrast with what happens with marital status, type of household or urban/rural way of life, there was no gender difference in relation to the other sociodemographic variables. The way in which nosological and clinical variables are associated with first episodes of schizophrenia was also examined in this study. We found that 75% of patients reached a maximum CATEGO-ID level, 71% received a S+ CATEGO diagnosis, 59% presented first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia and that the percentage of a schizophrenic negative syndrome, as identified by the SANS and SAPS, was very low.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Bizarre delusions and DSM-IV schizophrenia.The present study investigated whether schizophrenia patients with and without DSM-IV bizarre delusions, categorized as bizarre delusions of Schneiderian first rank symptoms (SBD) and as non-Schneiderian bizarre delusions (non-SBD), differed on demographic or clinical features, in view of the weight given to bizarre delusions in the diagnosis of schizophrenia. One hundred and twenty-nine in-patients with schizophrenia were assessed systematically for both types of bizarre delusions on the five domains of psychopathology of the Positive and Negative Syndrome Scale (PANSS; delusions/hallucinations, thought disorder/disorganization, excitement, negative symptoms and depressive symptoms) and for extrapyramidal side-effects. Inter-rater reliabilities for SBD and non-SBD were assessed and were exceptionally high (kappa value 0.85 and 0.92, respectively). Neither SBD nor non-SBD were associated with any demographic or non-PANSS clinical characteristics tested. However, the presence of non-SBD was significantly associated with more severe psychopathology in all five domains of the PANSS, whereas the presence of SBD was significantly associated with more severe psychopathology in three domains only: delusions/hallucinations, thought disorder/disorganization and depressive symptoms. However, patients with only SBD did not differ from patients with only non-SBD on any demographic or clinical variables, including five psychopathological domains. These findings suggest that, despite showing more severe symptoms, patients with DSM-IV bizarre delusions do not constitute a clinically distinguishable subgroup.Diagnosis of schizophrenia.Case records of ninety consecutive first lifetime admissions with a hospital diagnosis of schizophrenia were examined for Schneiderian first rank symptoms, the Feighner diagnostic criteria, and the New Haven Schizophrenia Index. Diagnostic exclusion criteria were developed and applied. It is concluded that the hospital diagnosis of schizophrenia is likely to be too broad. Each diagnostic system can increase accuracy of diagnosis, but their exclusion criteria are too vague and the system would be improved by using those given here. Each diagnostic system selects similar groups of patients, and can be applied retrospectively to adequate case records.Heritability of Schneider's first-rank symptoms.Schneider's first-rank symptoms are given particular weight when making a diagnosis of schizophrenia, but the nuclear syndrome, characterised by one or more first-rank symptoms, has been found previously to have no heritability.To estimate the heritability of the nuclear syndrome.A total of 224 twin pairs (106 monozygotic, 118 same-gender dizygotic) were ascertained from the Maudsley Twin Register in London via probands with any psychosis. Lifetime-ever first-rank symptoms were rated using the OPCRIT checklist. Probandwise concordance rates were calculated for the nuclear syndrome and a heritability estimate was derived from biometric model fitting.Probandwise concordance rates were 13/49 (26.5%) for monozygotic and 0/45 to 2/46 (0.0-4.3%) for dizygotic pairs. The heritability estimate for the best-fitting model was 71% (95% CI 57-82).These results indicate that the nuclear syndrome shows substantial heritability, although this is slightly lower than that for schizophrenia as defined by the DSM and ICD systems.Operational definitions of schizophrenia: what do they identify?Several studies have shown that different systems for diagnosing schizophrenia produce diagnoses with relatively low agreement. This, however, does not necessarily imply that the different systems are identifying conceptually different diagnostic groups. They may, in fact, identify a single entity, but with different degrees of accuracy. One-hundred ninety-six inpatients were diagnosed by multiple diagnostic systems. The pattern of relationship among the diagnoses was studied with latent class analysis, a statistical methodology which has not previously been applied to this type of data. Results indicated that the diagnoses of the Research Diagnostic Criteria, Flexible 6, Schneider, and 1978 Taylor and Abrams diagnostic systems all estimated a single underlying diagnosis. The Taylor and Abrams system identified this core diagnosis with high accuracy. The results also suggest that blunted affect and the absence of an affective syndrome are related to latent class schizophrenia, while the presence of only nonspecific delusions and/or hallucinations is not related. The appropriateness of the latent class definition of schizophrenia for selecting patients for research is discussed.Putative psychotic symptoms in the Mexican American population: prevalence and co-occurrence with psychiatric disorders.It is reported that Latin Americans describe culturally normative experiences or express putative psychotic symptoms in medical and mental health treatment settings that complicate the diagnostic process. Previous research reported that Latinos were more likely than European Americans and African Americans to have their diagnoses changed from schizophrenia to other disorders. This study describes the prevalence and likelihood of putative psychotic symptoms being expressed independent of any psychiatric disorder or co-occurring with common disorders such as depression or anxiety within a Mexican American population sample. Epidemiologic data of the Mexican American Prevalence and Services Survey (N = 3012) were used to contrast rates and patterns of putatively psychotic features among adults by demographic variables and diagnostic status using DSM-III-R criteria and receipt of treatment. Putative psychotic symptoms were reported by 17% of US-born and 7% of immigrants without disorders, and by 38% of US-born and 28% of immigrants with lifetime disorders, totaling 18% lifetime prevalence for the entire study population of Mexican Americans. First-rank Schneiderian symptoms were higher in those with a disorder compared with those without a disorder for both sexes. The results of this study indicate that putative psychotic symptoms are common among Mexican Americans, and their presence is a strong precautionary signal for evaluating clinicians to correctly distinguish whether putative psychotic symptoms are indicators of nonorganic psychoses or other psychiatric disorders, or are simply cultural expressions. Research is needed to identify the determinants of misdiagnosis in clinical practice, and guidelines are needed to assist clinicians.The positive triad of schizophrenic symptoms. Its statistical properties and its relationship to 13 traditional diagnostic systems.Using data from the WHO International Pilot Study of Schizophrenia and from our own previously reported series of 120 patients receiving treatment for schizophrenia, we ascertained the degree of agreement between 13 different systems for diagnosing schizophrenia. We identified a triad of symptoms similar to that from the International Pilot Study: auditory hallucinations, passivity feelings, and disturbances of affect. This triad correlated very strongly with the diagnosis of schizophrenia as determined by the 13 diagnostic systems, as well as with response to fluphenazine in our series. The triad should serve as a core set of symptoms in the study of schizophrenic illness. It represents the leading phenomena in a group of patients having what is generally considered to be schizophrenia, although it does not provide a definitive diagnosis. Evidence is needed on its specificity.Problem of diagnosis in postmortem brain studies of schizophrenia.The purpose of this study was to determine 1) the reliability of diagnoses of schizophrenia at coronal autopsy and 2) the degree to which the use of different diagnostic instruments for schizophrenia would affect postmortem brain research.Eighty-three subjects, recorded at coronal autopsy as having had schizophrenia, were referred for neurochemistry studies. The diagnoses reported to the state coroner's office were reevaluated by a review of psychiatric case histories by clinicians using semistructured assessment and diagnostic criteria.The application of DSM-III-R, Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC), ICD-10, Schneiderian, and Feighner criteria to the diagnosis of the 83 subjects revealed that 63.9%, 48.2%, 48,2%, 43.4%, and 42.2%, respectively, met the criteria for schizophrenia. Highest concordance was between the RDC and ICD-10 systems, while lowest concordance was between the RDC and Schneider systems.These data suggest that unless carefully reviewed, diagnosis may be a major confounding factor in postmortem studies of brain tissue from subjects with schizophrenia.Diagnosis of schizophrenia. Prediction of short-term outcome.Seven systems for the diagnosis of schizophrenia were compared in their ability to predict short-term outcome at follow-up: with each other, with selected specific symptoms, and with a simple additive composite symptom score. None of the systems nor the symptoms predicted strongly, but DSM-III and Schneiderian First Rank Symptoms and the composite score performed somewhat better than the other predictors.Empirical validation of competing definitions of schizophrenia: a poly-diagnostic study of cognitive impairment in non-affective psychosis.The empirical validation of diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia remains a controversial issue within psychiatry and allied sciences. Most diagnostic criteria are still influenced to a large extent by historical and consensus-based perspectives.A poly-diagnostic approach including a set of 23 operationalized diagnostic criteria were administered to probands with non-affective psychosis (n=169). In addition, participants completed a neuropsychological battery during a stable phase of the illness. Attentional, verbal and visual memory and executive functions were assessed. The control group was composed of 26 demographically matched healthy subjects. Analysis of variance was conducted taking neuropsychological performance as response variables and the 23 binary diagnostic systems as explanatory variables.Four out of the 23 operationalized diagnostic systems for schizophrenia (Feighner, French, Kraepelin and Langfeldt criteria) demonstrated high empirical validity for memory and executive functions scores (medium to moderate effect sizes). These 4 systems resemble classic nosological approaches based upon the 'outcome principle' concept, which suggests that schizophrenia leads to deterioration. However, diagnostic effectiveness of neuropsychological tests for the 23 operationalized diagnostic systems of schizophrenia was low (likelihood ratio <2).Neuropsychological functioning provides empirical validation to operationalized definitions of schizophrenia which are mainly based upon deterioration. It is suggested that some inconsistency of neurobiological studies in schizophrenia might result for using solely current consensus-based diagnostic systems. The implementation of poly-diagnostic strategies could contribute to improve the validity of the schizophrenia construct.McLean-Harvard International First-Episode Project: two-year stability of ICD-10 diagnoses in 500 first-episode psychotic disorder patients.Because clinical and biologic research and optimal clinical practice require stability of diagnoses over time, we determined stability of ICD-10 psychotic disorder diagnoses and sought predictors of diagnostic instability.Patients from the McLean-Harvard International First-Episode Project, conducted from 1989 to 2003, who were hospitalized for first psychotic illnesses (N = 500) were diagnosed by ICD-10 criteria at baseline and 24 months, on the basis of extensive prospective assessments, to evaluate the longitudinal stability of specific categorical diagnoses and predictors of diagnostic change.Diagnostic stability averaged 90.4%, ranking as follows: schizoaffective disorder (100.0%) > mania with psychosis (99.0%) > mixed affective episode (94.9%) > schizophrenia (94.6%) > delusional disorder (88.2%) > severe depressive episode with psychotic symptoms (85.2%) > acute psychosis with/without schizophrenia symptoms = unspecified psychosis (all 66.7%) > acute schizophrenia-like psychosis (28.6%). Diagnoses changed by 24 months of follow-up to schizoaffective disorder (37.5%), bipolar disorder (25.0%), schizophrenia (16.7%), or unspecified nonorganic psychosis (8.3%), mainly through emerging affective features. By logistic regression, diagnostic change was associated with Schneiderian first-rank psychotic symptoms at intake > lack of premorbid substance use.We found some psychotic disorder diagnoses to be more stable by ICD-10 than DSM-IV criteria in the same patients, with implications for revisions of both diagnostic systems.Effect of diagnostic criteria on the ratio of male to female schizophrenic patients.Contrary to earlier epidemiological data, recent evidence points to a significantly greater proportion of men than women among schizophrenic patients diagnosed by current restrictive criteria. In this study, the authors analyzed the effect of using six different diagnostic systems (varying in their stringency) on the male to female ratio of schizophrenia among 387 inpatients. Diagnostic criteria representing a broad conceptualization of schizophrenia, such as the New Haven Schizophrenia Index, consistently yielded equal rates of schizophrenia among men and women. Those diagnostic systems representing more stringently defined schizophrenia, such as the Research Diagnostic Criteria, consistently yielded a male to female ratio significantly greater than the male to female ratio of the total sample.First-rank symptoms and Bleuler's basic symptoms. New results in applying the polydiagnostic approach.By comparing six different operational diagnostic systems (International Classification of Diseases, Diagnostic and Statistical Manual; 3rd ed., Research Diagnostic Criteria, St. Louis criteria, Taylor criteria and Vienna Research Criteria), the data presented in this paper illustrate how attribution to various categories of functional psychoses varies according to the applied algorithms. Bleuler's basic symptoms are obviously considered by all of the compared systems to be more significant for attribution to schizophrenia than first-rank symptoms.Diagnostic evaluation of Schneider first rank symptoms of schizophrenia among three groups of Iranians.Psychotic symptom patterns and the diagnosis of schizophrenia.In comparing 101 psychotic patients subtyped by DSM-III criteria into paranoia, schizophrenia, schizoaffective, and affective disorders, we failed to distinguish them on the basis of delusional and hallucinatory experiences. These 'productive', 'positive' or 'irritative' symptoms--which the literature tends to link with temporolimbic dysfunction--did not appear specifically linked to schizophrenia. By contrast, 'negative' or 'deficit' symptoms--which the literature tends to relate to frontal lobe dysfunction--appeared more specific--especially for the disorganized subtype of schizophrenia. Although these data tend to support Bleulerian over Schneiderian conceptualization of schizophrenia, the heterogeneity of neuropsychological deficits implied in the negative symptom complexes limits the nosologic utility of the rubric of schizophrenia so defined.Factor structure and familiality of first-rank symptoms in sibling pairs with schizophrenia and schizoaffective disorder.Since their introduction as diagnostic criteria by Schneider in 1937, nuclear symptoms have played a key role in concepts of schizophrenia, but their relationship to each other and to genetic predisposition has been unclear.To ascertain the factor structure and familiality of nuclear symptoms.Nuclear (Schneiderian) symptoms were extracted from case notes and interviews in a study of 103 sibling pairs with DSM-III-R schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder.Principal components analysis demonstrated two major factors: one, accounting for about 50% of the variance, groups thought withdrawal, insertion and broadcasting, with delusions of control; and the second, accounting for < 20% of the variance, groups together third-person voices, thought echo and running commentary. Factor I was significantly correlated within sibling pairs.The correlation within sibling pairs suggests that, contrary to the conclusion of some previous studies, some nuclear symptoms do show a degree of familiality and therefore perhaps heritability.A polydiagnostic and dimensional comparison of epileptic psychoses and schizophrenia spectrum disorders.After establishing the validity of the Japanese version of the Operational Criteria Checklist for Psychotic Illness (OPCRIT), we applied it to 58 consecutive patients with epileptic psychoses (index group) and to age- and sex-matched controls with schizophrenia spectrum disorders (control group). Compared with the control group, the index group had a low family history of schizophrenia, high premorbid personality disorder and unemployment, abrupt or acute onset of psychosis, good recovery with single or multiple episodes, and low deterioration from a premorbid level of function. From 9% to 52% of the index group and 38% to 84% of the control group were diagnosed with schizophrenia according to the operational criteria used. The percentages of patients diagnosed with schizophrenia based on various diagnostic criteria in the two groups were similar. In the index group, a diagnosis of schizophrenia was more commonly made among patients with inter-ictal psychosis than among those with post-ictal psychosis. An exploratory factor analysis identified five factor solutions of manic, negative, depressive, vegetative, and positive symptoms. Although positive and negative factor values were lower in the index group than in the control group, the two groups shared a similar factor profile. These results indicate that the difference in symptomatology between the two groups was quantitative rather than qualitative.Prognostic value of initial subtype in schizophrenic disorders.The prognostic value of the subtype diagnosis at the initial episode was investigated in 148 narrowly defined schizophrenic patients. Every initial episode was classified according to multiple criteria: DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the positive/negative dichotomy, and Schneider's first rank symptoms. Patients were followed up on average 23 years later (range 10-50 years). Different aspects of long-term outcome were evaluated (global functioning, social adjustment, negative social consequences). In 93% of the patients persisting alterations were found at the end of the observation time. The influence of the predominant clinical features at the initial episode on various aspects of long-term outcome was found to differ depending on which of the four diagnostic systems was used. The highest power for discrimination was found for the subtypes of DSM-III-R, while the presence of first rank symptoms had no prognostic value. It was found that patients with an initial paranoid or positive episode had a significantly better long-term outcome than patients initially having a disorganised/hebephrenic or catatonic episode. The frequency of negative social consequences was not influenced by the initial subtype, with the exception of permanent hospitalisation.Schneiderian first rank symptoms in a sample of schizophrenic patients in Egypt.Schneiderian first rank symptoms are included in the most influential operative diagnostic criteria, such as the ICD-10 and the DSM-IV. Many studies have examined their prevalence in the West, but their prevalence in non-Western countries still needs to be explored given that cultural beliefs are so different.The aim of this study is to shed some light on Schneiderian first rank symptoms (FRS) as they occur in patients with schizophrenia in Egypt.Forty-two patients were interviewed, their demographic characteristics studied and FRS elicited. The SPSS computer program was used to analyse the data.The prevalence rate of FRS was found to be 67%, which is similar to previous studies both in the East and the West. The study also showed that demographic variables had no significant relation to the prevalence of FRS except for nationality and social status.Schneiderian first rank symptoms transcend cultural barriers. However, strong cultural beliefs about the influence of supernatural forces on humans should nonetheless be carefully considered in eliciting delusions of control, influence or passivity.Inter-rater reliability of twelve diagnostic systems of schizophrenia.The present and past symptomatology of 31 chronic schizophrenics was rated by four independent judges, two experienced clinical psychiatrists and two psychiatric residents, in a context more representative of actual clinical practice than most research studies. Ratings were made on 64 symptoms derived from 12 diagnostic systems, based on either live or videotaped interviews for present symptomatology and case records for past symptomatology. Inter-rater reliabilities were higher for present than for past symptoms, and in general did not approach those reported for highly trained raters. There were no differences between live and videotaped interviews. Diagnostic systems differed widely in rater agreement. The most consistent across both past and present symptomatology were the systems of Langfeldt, Schneider, and DSM-III, for which the level of reliability was consistent with other studies.Screening criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia in deaf patients.Confusion about symptoms of schizophrenia in deaf patients leads to misdiagnosis or failure of diagnosis in some individuals. Consequently, we used Schneider's symptoms of schizophrenia, the International Pilot Study of Schizophrenia's list of discriminating symptoms of schizophrenia, and a symptom checklist from DSM-III to evaluate retrospectively 13 deaf adult schizophrenic patients in whom diagnosis were made using DSM-II. Fifteen signs and symptoms were identified in those schizophrenic patients; six symptoms (poor insight, lability of affect, poverty of content, poor rapport, vagueness, and inability to complete a course of action) are usual in nonpsychotic as well as psychotic deaf patients. The nine "primary" symptoms (loss of ego boundaries, delusional perceptions, restricted affect, illogicality, abnormal explanations, hallucinations, inappropriate affect, remoteness from reality, and ambivalence) are useful screening criteria in the diagnosis of schizophrenia in deaf patients.Schneider-oriented versus Conrad-oriented psychiatric diagnosis in the same German clinic.The Chair of the University Nervenklinik in Homburg/Saar was held by Klaus Conrad from 1949-58 and by H.-H. Meyer, a former pupil and colleague of Kurt Schneider, from 1962-72. As the catchment area and admission policy of the clinic remained substantially unchanged throughout, comparison of the relative proportions of all admissions allocated to different diagnostic categories in 1949-58 and 1962-72 can be used to elucidate the similarities and differences between Conrad's and Schneider's diagnostic criteria. The results of this comparison indicate that Schneider's concept of schizophrenia was broader than Conrad's, and his concept of manic-depressive depression more restricted. More detailed comparisons are complicated by differences in nomenclature and in the varieties of functional mental illness recognized in the two periods. However, it seems that Conrad's concept of mania was wider only when the atypical schizophrenia-like psychoses diagnosed during the Conrad era were added to the Conrad-oriented cases of mania; when this was not done, the Schneiderian concept of mania was broader.Prognostic implications of six alternative definitions of schizophrenia.The ability of six different operational definitions of schizophrenia to identify prospectively patients whose eventual prognosis would be poor was studied using data from a six-year follow-up of a series of 134 patients with functional psychoses. All six definitions were more successful at predicting a poor symptomatic outcome than a poor social outcome. Spitzer's Research Diagnostic Criteria, Carpenter's flexible criteria, and Langfeldt's criteria predicted a poor outcome as well as the original clinical diagnoses and were considerably better than the New Haven criteria, Schneider's first rank symptoms, or the computer program Catego.Clinical polydiagnostic studies in a large Swedish pedigree with schizophrenia.A polydiagnostic computerized diagnostic system for psychosis was used in a Swedish family complex, and 51 patients with psychiatric symptomatology were examined with eight main diagnostic systems for schizophrenia and three systems for schizophrenic subgroups. All patients fulfilled the criteria for schizophrenia according to Taylor et al., 50 according to Carpenter, 41 according to RDC, and 31 of the 51 according to DSM-III and DSM-III-R. The hypothesis that the patients in the Swedish family complex differ from other phenotypes of schizophrenia must be refuted based on the data of the present study.The validity of schizophrenia diagnosis in the Finnish Hospital Discharge Register: findings from a 10-year birth cohort sample.The purpose of this study was to investigate the diagnostic validity of schizophrenia in the Finnish Hospital Discharge Register (FHDR) with a large, epidemiologically representative sample using a multidiagnostic approach (DSM-III-R, DSM-IV, ICD-10), and to find additional criteria that could be used to improve the validity of schizophrenia diagnosis in future register-based research that utilizes the FHDR. The study population consisted of all individuals (n=877) who were born in Helsinki, Finland, between 1 January 1951 and 31 December 1960, and who had had at least one diagnosis of schizophrenia, schizophreniform disorder or schizoaffective disorder in the FHDR. All their available hospital case notes were collected. The total number of subjects for whom case notes were obtained was 806. We used the OPCRIT system (version 3.4) to produce diagnoses according to ICD-10, DSM-III-R and DSM-IV criteria based on the information extracted from the hospital case notes. We examined the distribution of the DSM-III-R, DSM-IV and ICD-10 diagnoses generated by the OPCRIT and calculated the proportion of individuals who received the same diagnosis in the FHDR and in the OPCRIT assessment. The proportion of subjects who received a core schizophrenia spectrum diagnosis (schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder or schizophreniform disorder) in both the FHDR and OPCRIT assessment varied between 75% (DSM-III-R criteria) and 78% (ICD-10 criteria). Of the subjects with a narrow schizophrenia diagnosis in the FHDR, between 74% (DSM-IV) and 78% (ICD-10) received a diagnosis of schizophrenia in the reassessment depending on the diagnostic criteria applied. Eighty per cent of those who had received a core schizophrenia spectrum FHDR diagnosis after 1982 (vs. 56% of those who had received their last schizophrenia diagnosis in 1982 or before) received a DSM-IV diagnosis of core schizophrenia spectrum disorder. Of the 58 subjects in the sample who had been given at various times diagnoses of both core schizophrenia diagnosis and bipolar I diagnosis in FHDR, 43% received a core schizophrenia spectrum diagnosis according to DSM-IV criteria. The validity of the FHDR schizophrenia diagnosis is acceptable for large-scale register studies and comparable with that of other Nordic registers. Diagnostic validity can be further improved by selecting subjects who have core schizophrenia spectrum disorder as the latest diagnosis, by omitting cases diagnosed before 1982, and by excluding cases with a register diagnoses of both a core schizophrenia spectrum and bipolar I disorder.Diagnostic agreement of schizophrenia spectrum disorders among chronic patients with functional psychoses.To investigate whether diagnostic agreement across different diagnostic systems improves in a sample of chronic patients suffering from functional psychosis compared to first-admitted patients.Among 353 patients with a history of functional psychosis, a subset of 100 individuals (35 women and 65 men) were randomly sampled and assessed using the Operational Criteria Checklist for Psychotic Illness and Affective Illness (OPCRIT). Based on the OPCRIT diagnoses the subjects suffering from schizophrenia and schizophrenia spectrum disorders according to seven diagnostic systems were identified. Diagnostic agreement was assessed using unweighted kappa-statistics and pairwise concordance rates (CR).High diagnostic agreement of schizophrenia was observed across the ICD-10 and DSM systems (CR >0.70, kappa >0.70), which all had a significantly lower concordance to the St. Louis Criteria (SLC), research diagnostic criteria and Schneider's first rank symptoms (FRS) (0.32< CR <0.66; -0.10< kappa <0.51). Agreement on schizophrenia across all systems was observed for one fourth of the subjects. Elimination of the diagnostic impact of 'co-occurrence of psychotic and affective symptoms' excluded FRS standalone individuals from the sample, increased overall homogeneity and resulted in a dichotomized sample according to SLC (46 positive vs. 47 negative). SLC status could be predicted in 78% of cases by four items relating to family history and psychosocial function previous to the onset of illness. Similarly high pairwise CR were observed for schizophrenia spectrum disorders across all diagnostic systems.This study demonstrates that diagnostic agreement is higher among chronic patients than that observed in subjects with a recent onset of psychosis, although considerable discordance is also observed in this chronic sample. However, the discordance among chronic patients with functional psychosis largely derives from the different emphasis that diagnostic systems place on co-occurrence of psychotic and affective symptoms. This may have serious epistemological consequences, thus underlining the conventional nature of the present schizophrenia diagnoses and the need for biologically founded diagnostic criteria.Long-term course of schizophrenic illness: Bleuler's study reconsidered.The influential 1972 study by Manfred Bleuler on the long-term course of schizophrenic illness has been reconsidered. The authors tested the diagnosis of schizophrenia in all patients and investigated how the distribution of the types of illness course and outcome would change after exclusion of patients whose diagnosis of schizophrenia could not be confirmed by modern diagnostic standards.Clinical charts and Bleuler's research notes on the original sample were assessed, and all patients were rediagnosed with the help of DSM-IV, DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC), Schneider's criteria, and an operationalized version of the criteria of Eugen Bleuler.The diagnosis of schizophrenia was not confirmed in about 30% of the sample; the majority of these patients were rediagnosed with schizoaffective disorder. High diagnostic agreement was found between DSM-IV, DSM-III-R, ICD-10, and RDC; there was much less agreement with Bleuler's and Schneider's criteria. After exclusion of patients whose schizophrenia diagnosis was not confirmed, the proportion of patients with undulating course and recovery slightly decreased, and the proportion of patients with severe end state slightly increased. Nevertheless, the distribution of the types of long-term course did not significantly change, and even among patients with strictly defined schizophrenia, half had an undulating course with remissions and 12%-15% recovered.Schizophrenic illness remains heterogeneous with regard to illness course and outcome even when narrowly diagnosed with the help of modern operationalized diagnostic criteria. Contemporary differentiation between schizophrenic and schizoaffective disorders is prognostically valid.Concurrent validity of the OPCRIT diagnostic system. Comparison of OPCRIT diagnoses with consensus best-estimate lifetime diagnoses.OPCRIT (a suite of computer programs that allow data entry and generate diagnoses according to 12 operational diagnostic systems) is used in a wide range of psychiatric research including both European Science Foundation and NIMH research initiatives in the molecular genetics of mental disorders. We examined its concurrent validity in 100 subjects collected for linkage studies of Bipolar Disorder and Schizophrenia.We compared diagnoses generated by OPCRIT from data rated by two trained clinicians with diagnoses made according to consensus, best-estimate, lifetime procedures by the same two raters according to DSM-III-R and RDC classifications.Good to excellent agreement was achieved between OPCRIT diagnoses and those made by consensus best-estimate procedures.OPCRIT provides a convenient, reliable, rapid and valid approach to polydiagnostic assessment that can be used as an adjunct to conventional (but time consulting) best-estimate consensus diagnostic procedures.Diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia: reliabilities and agreement between systems.We compared the joint frequencies and reliabilities of the following sets of criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia: the New Haven Schizophrenia Index: the Carpenter, Strauss, Bartko (4-, 5-, 6-, and 7-item) system; DSM-III; Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC; full and chronic); the Feighner system; and the 1975 criteria of Taylor and Abrams. The systems, of essentially equal reliability, varied sevenfold in their rates of diagnosing schizophrenia. Patients in whom schizophrenia was diagnosed by the lower-rate systems were likely to receive the same diagnosis by the higher-rate systems. This tends not to be the cases when an affective syndrome is present.Schizophrenia: diagnostic criteria and outcome.The files of a cohort of schizophrenic patients who were admitted to hospital for the first time in their lives in 1963, and who were representative of cases in a large unselected population, were examined , first by exclusion criteria, and then by the diagnostic criteria of Schneider's first-rank symptoms, Feighner et al's criteria, and the New Haven Schizophrenia Index (NHSI). Forty-three such cases were found who were schizophrenic on at least two sets of criteria, and who were followed up in 1977. Examination of the outcome showed no relationship with FRS presence or absence or number of first-rank symptoms, nor with the NHSI score, but did show a relationship to the Feighner et al criteria and an even stronger relationship to a simple score derived from these criteria.The DSM-III concepts of schizophrenic disorder and schizophreniform disorder. A clinical and prognostic evaluation.Consecutive new patients presenting at a Nigerian psychiatric unit over a 14-month period and fulfilling the DSM-III criteria for schizophreniform disorder, (active) schizophrenia and residual schizophrenia were studied. There were no differences between the three groups with respect to background social data. The schizophreniform patients had a lower incidence of previous psychotic episodes. There were no differences between the first two groups with respect to the distribution of PSE symptoms and signs, Schneider's First Rank Symptoms, or severity of psychopathology. Initial clinical outcome, and longer-term clinical and social outcome, assessed 25-38 months after index presentation, was best in the schizophreniform patients and worst in the patients with residual schizophrenia. The findings are consistent with schizophreniform disorder lying on a spectrum of schizophrenic disorders. They also highlight inadequacies in mental health services in Nigeria and other developing countries.Frequency and predictive values of first rank symptoms at baseline among 362 young adult patients with first-episode schizophrenia Results from the Danish OPUS study.To investigate the frequency of the Schneiderian First Rank Symptoms (FRSs) in a representative group of patients with first-episode schizophrenia and to analyse the predictive value of these symptoms in relation to psychopathology, work situation, depression, dependency and admission after 2 years of treatment.547 patients were included in the Danish OPUS trial. A subgroup of these, namely the 388 patients who fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia (ICD-10), was included in this study. Data from SCAN interviews were used to describe the frequency of the different first rank symptoms and to compare the characteristics of the patients with and without FRSs.FRSs were very common among these patients with first-episode schizophrenia. Only 16% reported no FRSs at all. Almost half of the patients had experienced commenting or discussing voices, and more than 40% had experienced loud thoughts. More patients with than without FRSs had some kind of substance abuse. FRSs at baseline did not predict the level of scores in the psychotic, negative or disorganized dimension after 2 years. Having FRSs at baseline was related to a significantly lower number of days of admission during the two-year period, but was not associated with antipsychotic medication or depression after 2 years.FRSs are very common among first-episode psychosis patients, but their predictive value seems to be limited with respect to outcome measures like psychopathology, work or substance abuse. However, FRSs did predict a lower mean of days of admission.A polydiagnostic approach to self-perceived cognitive disorders in schizophrenia.The relationship between the self-perceived cognitive disorders (SPCD) assessed using the Frankfurt Complaint Questionnaire (FCQ) and 21 definitions of schizophrenia was studied in a sample of 118 consecutively admitted patients. The FCQ total score was significantly associated (p < 0.05) with the presence of Schneider's, Yusin's and Present State Examination criteria of schizophrenia. A significant association, in this case negative, was also found between the FCQ total score and the presence of the DSM-III-R criteria of schizophrenia. The results suggest that the SPCDs are more associated with Schneider-related criteria than with chronic or deficit models of schizophrenia. It was also found that the female sex as well as the presence of insight were significantly associated with a greater number of SPCDs.Diagnostic overlap in schizophrenia research: relation to outcome predictors and family history.Five sets of criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia were compared on 47 hospitalized patients who fit New York Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC) for chronic schizophrenia. The other diagnostic systems used were the Flexible System. Feighner Criteria, New Haven Schizophrenia Index (NHSI), and Taylor-Abrams (TA) Criteria. The NSHI, the broadest system examined, fit all of the patients studied. In contrast, only 30 patients (63% of the sample) were diagnosed schizophrenic using TA Criteria. When the Strauss-Carpenter prognostic scale was used, patients who fit TA Criteria for schizophrenia did not differ in the prognostic scores from the remainder of the sample. In addition, the two groups did not differ in the familial rate of schizophrenia spectrum disorders. The usefulness of narrow versus broad diagnostic criteria in schizophrenia research is discussed.Heterogeneity of delusional syndromes: diagnostic criteria and course prognosis.In addition to genetic findings and treatment response, the course prognosis is also meant to be a possible validating criterion for diagnosis and diagnostic systems. In our study we used the polydiagnostic approach (i.e. the simultaneous application of various criteria for diagnosing a given disorder to one and the same population) to test the ability of several diagnostic systems to create homogeneous groups regarding the course (episodic/chronic). We applied Schneider's FRS, ICD-9, DSM-III, Spitzer's RDC and the Vienna Research Criteria to 90 patients with the diagnosis of delusional syndrome (aside from any nosological classification), who underwent 6-9 years of follow-up. At the index examination, schizophrenia was most frequently diagnosed with Schneider's FRS, which apparently encompasses a very heterogeneous group of patients regarding psychopathology and course. Diagnostic systems which allowed the diagnosis of affective disorders despite the presence of mood-incongruent delusional symptomatology (DSM-III, RDC, Vienna Criteria) or offered the diagnosis of schizoaffective disorder (DSM-III, RDC) succeeded in separating subgroups with an episodic course on a statistically significant level. In ICD-9 this significance appeared only after exclusion of the schizoaffective cases from the group of schizophrenias. Our data thus uphold the old rule of thumb that affective symptomatology apparently has a very high prognostic value regarding the course of the illness and is in this respect superior to productive symptomatology (such as delusions and hallucinations), still taken to be pathognomonic for schizophrenia by some of the diagnostic criteria under study. This aspect warrants further investigation and should be taken into account in the development and improvement of diagnostic manuals (e.g. ICD-10, DSM-IV).The polydiagnostic interview: a structured interview for the polydiagnostic classification of psychiatric patients.A structured interview (PODI) for the polydiagnostic evaluation of affective and schizophrenic disorders is presented. The interview includes elements of the Structured Clinical Interview for DSM-III (SCID) and of the Present State Examination (PSE). The central idea of this interview is to break down complex criteria into their elements, to assess a wide area of such elements, and to recombine them by a computer program according to different algorithms that are included in a greater number of operational diagnoses. Reliability data will be presented which show sufficiently high kappa and Yule coefficients for a selected set of diagnostic criteria for depressive, manic and psychotic disorders. The applicability of the PODI was established in about 180 interviews.Prognostic validity of the cycloid psychoses. A prospective follow-up study.In a prospective 4-year follow-up study, 26 out of 31 patients initially diagnosed as cycloid psychoses were investigated (anxiety-happiness psychosis n = 15; confusion psychosis n = 8; motility psychosis n = 3). Patients were independently interviewed by two clinical researchers. 61.5% showed one or several 'first-rank symptoms' according to Schneider. In addition, the SADS-LA was applied for RDC and DSM-IIIR diagnoses. According to these classification systems most of the patients were diagnosed as schizophrenic or schizoaffective. Personal interview as well as application of the Strauss-Carpenter Outcome Scale indicated a highly favorable clinical outcome, i.e. lack of affective or behavioral defective states in literally all patients of the study. These results justify the distinction of the cycloid psychoses as a nosological entity in general and--less convincingly--of the three subtypes of cycloid psychoses.The predictive validity of a diagnosis of schizophrenia. A report from the International Study of Schizophrenia (ISoS) coordinated by the World Health Organization and the Department of Psychiatry, University of Nottingham.Outcome is important in the validation of psychiatric diagnosis, as most disorders lack clinicopathological correlates. We describe the predictive validity of four definitions of schizophrenia (DSM-III-R, ICD-10, ICD-9 and CATEGO S+), in a representative cohort of patients selected during their first episode of psychosis.Each definition of schizophrenia was applied to 99 patients. Their respective ability to predict 13-year outcome (Global Assessment of Functioning scales) was assessed.DSM-III-R and ICD-10 diagnoses of schizophrenia have high predictive validity for long-term outcome, and both provide relatively stable diagnoses. ICD-9 is reasonably good at predicting disability, but not symptoms, and CATEGO S+ showed no predictive validity. Adding six-month duration criteria to ICD-10, ICD-9 and CATEGO S+ improved their predictive validity, and removing the six-month duration criterion from DSM-III-R commensurately reduced predictive validity.Modern diagnostic systems (DSM-III-R and ICD-10) have high predictive validity, and are superior to ICD-9. The six-month duration criterion of DSM-III-R schizophrenia accounts for its predictive validity and stability over 13 years, but restricts its use in first-episode studies. The one-month duration criterion of ICD-10 is less restrictive, without major compromises in predictive validity or stability.Acute psychotic reactions in Caribbean-born patients.A prospective study of patients with religious delusions identified 24 West Indian and West African patients. Those who had none of Schneider's first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia (principally West Indians) differed from those who did by virtue of early religious commitment, life-long religious experiences, an acute admission precipitated by social events, a greater chance of having their diagnosis changed, less than 10 different PSE syndromes, the absence of 'twentieth-century' delusions, and the presentation of malevolent witchcraft as the sole explanation of the episode. It is suggested that this group can usefully be considered as demonstrating an acute psychotic reaction of the type previously described in Africa and the Caribbean.Schizophrenia in ICD-10: a field trial of suggested diagnostic guidelines.A tenth version of the International Classification of Diseases (ICD-10) is currently being prepared by the World Health Organization, who called for field trials of suggested guidelines. A field trial of the guidelines for the diagnosis of schizophrenia is presented. There is a consistency with ICD-9-based diagnosis. Schneider's First-Rank Symptoms (FRS) acquire special importance in the suggested guidelines, but caution is necessary in detecting these symptoms in cultures in which socioculturally shared beliefs bear a resemblance to FRS.Outcome of schizophrenia in India using various diagnostic systems.A group of 112 patients diagnosed to be suffering from schizophrenia according to ICD-9 concept of this disorder were followed-up for a period of 18-30 months. Five diagnostic systems for schizophrenia: CATEGO, Research Diagnostic Criteria, Feighner's Criteria, DSM-III and Schneider's First Rank Symptoms were also applied to the study group at the beginning of the investigation. The outcome was assessed in the areas of clinical improvement, course, severity of illness and work. The course of the disorder and outcome in various definitions did not reveal significant variability though patients diagnosed to be schizophrenics according to DSM-III tended to display more psychopathology and impaired work efficiency at the time of follow-up.The reassessment of chronic patients previously diagnosed as schizophrenic.Sixty-one outpatients with clinical diagnoses of schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder were systematically reevaluated with a structured historical diagnostic interview, the Schedule for Affective Disorders and Schizophrenia-Lifetime Version, and with a review of their charts. Research diagnoses were then constructed by applying Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC) to the interview data and seven diagnostic systems to the chart data. Of the 61 patients, 43 (70.5%) were again recognized to be schizophrenic by the RDC applied to the interview data and 39 (63.5%) met chart criteria. Fifty-one patients (83.6%) were rediagnosed as schizophrenic by at least one of these approaches (excluding the NHSI chart criteria). There was, however, great variation in rediagnostic assignment because of variations in the diagnostic criteria and chart data. Many of the patients who did not meet criteria for schizophrenia met criteria for affective disorder. Patients were assigned to one of four categories according to whether interview or chart rediagnosis was positive or negative for schizophrenia. This categorization was used to search for factors that might account for patients who did not receive a rediagnosis of schizophrenia.The diagnostic status of first-rank symptoms.In the International Statistical Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision(ICD-10) and Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorder, Third and Fourth Edition(DSM-III-IV), the presence of one of Schneider "first-rank symptoms" (FRS) is symptomatically sufficient for the schizophrenia diagnosis. Yet, it has been claimed that FRS may also be found in the nonschizophrenic conditions, and therefore, they are not specific or diagnostic for schizophrenia. This review was made to clarify the issue of diagnostic specificity.(1) A critical review of FRS studies published in English between 1970 and 2005. (2) A highlight of the 5 most frequently cited studies identified in the Web of Science. (3) Theoretical implications of the epistemological issues of FRS.The reviewed studies do not allow for either a reconfirmation or a rejection of Schneider's claims about FRS. The sources of disagreement between the studies are (1) including or excluding acute patients with potential degradation of consciousness; (2) assessing or not the phenomenological context; (3) assessing patients in different stages of their illness evolution; and (4) differential emphasis on mood symptoms and history of psychiatric symptoms.Both DSM-IV and ICD-10 emphasize FRS to a degree that is not supported by the empirical evidence. Until the status of FRS is clarified in depth, we suggest that the FRS, as these are currently defined, should be de-emphasized in the next revisions of our diagnostic systems. Future studies aiming at validation of FRS as diagnostic features need to apply a phenomenological perspective and include a homogenous group of patients across a wide spectrum of diagnoses.A study of Schneider's first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia in Nigerian patients.A prospective evaluation of Schneider's first-rank symptoms in 56 Nigerians with RDC schizophrenia gave a prevalence of 73%. The presence of first-rank symptoms was unrelated to schizophrenic subtypes, duration or severity of illness. While some of the symptoms correlate with age of patients, the pattern of inter-correlations among them supports previous views about their empirical heterogeneity.Subtypes in schizophrenic disorders: frequencies in long-term course and premorbid features.The subclassification of schizophrenic disorders according to four diagnostic systems (DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the positive vs. negative dichotomy and Schneider's first rank symptoms) was compared over the long-term course of the disease in 148 narrowly defined schizophrenic patients. A total of 595 episodes were classified over a mean observation period of 23 years (range 10-50 years). Initially, paranoid/positive subtypes predominated, while later in the course episodes fulfilling the symptomatological criteria of residual/negative subtypes became more frequent. Disorganised/hebephrenic and catatonic subtypes were found to be rare. Some premorbid features were investigated as non-symptomatological validators for subclassification. Significant differences were found with regard to age at onset. Patients whose first episode was paranoid or positive had the highest age at onset. Patients with initial disorganised/hebephrenic or "residual" episodes had the most unfavourable premorbid social adjustment, even when the influence of age at onset was discounted. The diagnostic systems investigated showed similarities and differences as a result of the underlying concepts. Methodological implications are discussed.The Cantabria first episode schizophrenia study: a summary of general findings.This article describes the general findings of the initial cross-sectional stage of a prospective follow-up study of all first episodes of schizophrenia that occurred in the Autonomous Community of Cantabria over a 2-year period and that established contact with any mental health service. The project comprises: i) a 2-year cross-sectional stage, in which the sample was gathered and studied with structured psychiatric instruments such as the Present State Examination and the Scales for the Assessment of Negative and Positive Symptoms (SANS and SAPS), and; ii) a continuous follow-up. We detected, in the risk age ranged of 15-54 years, an incidence of 1.9 per 10,000 inhabitants per year for schizophrenia and of 1.3 per 10,000 inhabitants per year for the S+ CATEGO diagnosis, without any significant gender difference of morbidity. The mean age for the total schizophrenic population was 26 years, being significantly higher in women than in men. In contrast with what happens with marital status, type of household or urban/rural way of life, there was no gender difference in relation to the other sociodemographic variables. The way in which nosological and clinical variables are associated with first episodes of schizophrenia was also examined in this study. We found that 75% of patients reached a maximum CATEGO-ID level, 71% received a S+ CATEGO diagnosis, 59% presented first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia and that the percentage of a schizophrenic negative syndrome, as identified by the SANS and SAPS, was very low.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Bizarre delusions and DSM-IV schizophrenia.The present study investigated whether schizophrenia patients with and without DSM-IV bizarre delusions, categorized as bizarre delusions of Schneiderian first rank symptoms (SBD) and as non-Schneiderian bizarre delusions (non-SBD), differed on demographic or clinical features, in view of the weight given to bizarre delusions in the diagnosis of schizophrenia. One hundred and twenty-nine in-patients with schizophrenia were assessed systematically for both types of bizarre delusions on the five domains of psychopathology of the Positive and Negative Syndrome Scale (PANSS; delusions/hallucinations, thought disorder/disorganization, excitement, negative symptoms and depressive symptoms) and for extrapyramidal side-effects. Inter-rater reliabilities for SBD and non-SBD were assessed and were exceptionally high (kappa value 0.85 and 0.92, respectively). Neither SBD nor non-SBD were associated with any demographic or non-PANSS clinical characteristics tested. However, the presence of non-SBD was significantly associated with more severe psychopathology in all five domains of the PANSS, whereas the presence of SBD was significantly associated with more severe psychopathology in three domains only: delusions/hallucinations, thought disorder/disorganization and depressive symptoms. However, patients with only SBD did not differ from patients with only non-SBD on any demographic or clinical variables, including five psychopathological domains. These findings suggest that, despite showing more severe symptoms, patients with DSM-IV bizarre delusions do not constitute a clinically distinguishable subgroup.Diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia: reliabilities and agreement between systems.We compared the joint frequencies and reliabilities of the following sets of criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia: the New Haven Schizophrenia Index: the Carpenter, Strauss, Bartko (4-, 5-, 6-, and 7-item) system; DSM-III; Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC; full and chronic); the Feighner system; and the 1975 criteria of Taylor and Abrams. The systems, of essentially equal reliability, varied sevenfold in their rates of diagnosing schizophrenia. Patients in whom schizophrenia was diagnosed by the lower-rate systems were likely to receive the same diagnosis by the higher-rate systems. This tends not to be the cases when an affective syndrome is present.Diagnosis of schizophrenia.Case records of ninety consecutive first lifetime admissions with a hospital diagnosis of schizophrenia were examined for Schneiderian first rank symptoms, the Feighner diagnostic criteria, and the New Haven Schizophrenia Index. Diagnostic exclusion criteria were developed and applied. It is concluded that the hospital diagnosis of schizophrenia is likely to be too broad. Each diagnostic system can increase accuracy of diagnosis, but their exclusion criteria are too vague and the system would be improved by using those given here. Each diagnostic system selects similar groups of patients, and can be applied retrospectively to adequate case records.Heritability of Schneider's first-rank symptoms.Schneider's first-rank symptoms are given particular weight when making a diagnosis of schizophrenia, but the nuclear syndrome, characterised by one or more first-rank symptoms, has been found previously to have no heritability.To estimate the heritability of the nuclear syndrome.A total of 224 twin pairs (106 monozygotic, 118 same-gender dizygotic) were ascertained from the Maudsley Twin Register in London via probands with any psychosis. Lifetime-ever first-rank symptoms were rated using the OPCRIT checklist. Probandwise concordance rates were calculated for the nuclear syndrome and a heritability estimate was derived from biometric model fitting.Probandwise concordance rates were 13/49 (26.5%) for monozygotic and 0/45 to 2/46 (0.0-4.3%) for dizygotic pairs. The heritability estimate for the best-fitting model was 71% (95% CI 57-82).These results indicate that the nuclear syndrome shows substantial heritability, although this is slightly lower than that for schizophrenia as defined by the DSM and ICD systems.Operational definitions of schizophrenia: what do they identify?Several studies have shown that different systems for diagnosing schizophrenia produce diagnoses with relatively low agreement. This, however, does not necessarily imply that the different systems are identifying conceptually different diagnostic groups. They may, in fact, identify a single entity, but with different degrees of accuracy. One-hundred ninety-six inpatients were diagnosed by multiple diagnostic systems. The pattern of relationship among the diagnoses was studied with latent class analysis, a statistical methodology which has not previously been applied to this type of data. Results indicated that the diagnoses of the Research Diagnostic Criteria, Flexible 6, Schneider, and 1978 Taylor and Abrams diagnostic systems all estimated a single underlying diagnosis. The Taylor and Abrams system identified this core diagnosis with high accuracy. The results also suggest that blunted affect and the absence of an affective syndrome are related to latent class schizophrenia, while the presence of only nonspecific delusions and/or hallucinations is not related. The appropriateness of the latent class definition of schizophrenia for selecting patients for research is discussed.Putative psychotic symptoms in the Mexican American population: prevalence and co-occurrence with psychiatric disorders.It is reported that Latin Americans describe culturally normative experiences or express putative psychotic symptoms in medical and mental health treatment settings that complicate the diagnostic process. Previous research reported that Latinos were more likely than European Americans and African Americans to have their diagnoses changed from schizophrenia to other disorders. This study describes the prevalence and likelihood of putative psychotic symptoms being expressed independent of any psychiatric disorder or co-occurring with common disorders such as depression or anxiety within a Mexican American population sample. Epidemiologic data of the Mexican American Prevalence and Services Survey (N = 3012) were used to contrast rates and patterns of putatively psychotic features among adults by demographic variables and diagnostic status using DSM-III-R criteria and receipt of treatment. Putative psychotic symptoms were reported by 17% of US-born and 7% of immigrants without disorders, and by 38% of US-born and 28% of immigrants with lifetime disorders, totaling 18% lifetime prevalence for the entire study population of Mexican Americans. First-rank Schneiderian symptoms were higher in those with a disorder compared with those without a disorder for both sexes. The results of this study indicate that putative psychotic symptoms are common among Mexican Americans, and their presence is a strong precautionary signal for evaluating clinicians to correctly distinguish whether putative psychotic symptoms are indicators of nonorganic psychoses or other psychiatric disorders, or are simply cultural expressions. Research is needed to identify the determinants of misdiagnosis in clinical practice, and guidelines are needed to assist clinicians.The positive triad of schizophrenic symptoms. Its statistical properties and its relationship to 13 traditional diagnostic systems.Using data from the WHO International Pilot Study of Schizophrenia and from our own previously reported series of 120 patients receiving treatment for schizophrenia, we ascertained the degree of agreement between 13 different systems for diagnosing schizophrenia. We identified a triad of symptoms similar to that from the International Pilot Study: auditory hallucinations, passivity feelings, and disturbances of affect. This triad correlated very strongly with the diagnosis of schizophrenia as determined by the 13 diagnostic systems, as well as with response to fluphenazine in our series. The triad should serve as a core set of symptoms in the study of schizophrenic illness. It represents the leading phenomena in a group of patients having what is generally considered to be schizophrenia, although it does not provide a definitive diagnosis. Evidence is needed on its specificity.Problem of diagnosis in postmortem brain studies of schizophrenia.The purpose of this study was to determine 1) the reliability of diagnoses of schizophrenia at coronal autopsy and 2) the degree to which the use of different diagnostic instruments for schizophrenia would affect postmortem brain research.Eighty-three subjects, recorded at coronal autopsy as having had schizophrenia, were referred for neurochemistry studies. The diagnoses reported to the state coroner's office were reevaluated by a review of psychiatric case histories by clinicians using semistructured assessment and diagnostic criteria.The application of DSM-III-R, Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC), ICD-10, Schneiderian, and Feighner criteria to the diagnosis of the 83 subjects revealed that 63.9%, 48.2%, 48,2%, 43.4%, and 42.2%, respectively, met the criteria for schizophrenia. Highest concordance was between the RDC and ICD-10 systems, while lowest concordance was between the RDC and Schneider systems.These data suggest that unless carefully reviewed, diagnosis may be a major confounding factor in postmortem studies of brain tissue from subjects with schizophrenia.Diagnosis of schizophrenia. Prediction of short-term outcome.Seven systems for the diagnosis of schizophrenia were compared in their ability to predict short-term outcome at follow-up: with each other, with selected specific symptoms, and with a simple additive composite symptom score. None of the systems nor the symptoms predicted strongly, but DSM-III and Schneiderian First Rank Symptoms and the composite score performed somewhat better than the other predictors.Empirical validation of competing definitions of schizophrenia: a poly-diagnostic study of cognitive impairment in non-affective psychosis.The empirical validation of diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia remains a controversial issue within psychiatry and allied sciences. Most diagnostic criteria are still influenced to a large extent by historical and consensus-based perspectives.A poly-diagnostic approach including a set of 23 operationalized diagnostic criteria were administered to probands with non-affective psychosis (n=169). In addition, participants completed a neuropsychological battery during a stable phase of the illness. Attentional, verbal and visual memory and executive functions were assessed. The control group was composed of 26 demographically matched healthy subjects. Analysis of variance was conducted taking neuropsychological performance as response variables and the 23 binary diagnostic systems as explanatory variables.Four out of the 23 operationalized diagnostic systems for schizophrenia (Feighner, French, Kraepelin and Langfeldt criteria) demonstrated high empirical validity for memory and executive functions scores (medium to moderate effect sizes). These 4 systems resemble classic nosological approaches based upon the 'outcome principle' concept, which suggests that schizophrenia leads to deterioration. However, diagnostic effectiveness of neuropsychological tests for the 23 operationalized diagnostic systems of schizophrenia was low (likelihood ratio <2).Neuropsychological functioning provides empirical validation to operationalized definitions of schizophrenia which are mainly based upon deterioration. It is suggested that some inconsistency of neurobiological studies in schizophrenia might result for using solely current consensus-based diagnostic systems. The implementation of poly-diagnostic strategies could contribute to improve the validity of the schizophrenia construct.McLean-Harvard International First-Episode Project: two-year stability of ICD-10 diagnoses in 500 first-episode psychotic disorder patients.Because clinical and biologic research and optimal clinical practice require stability of diagnoses over time, we determined stability of ICD-10 psychotic disorder diagnoses and sought predictors of diagnostic instability.Patients from the McLean-Harvard International First-Episode Project, conducted from 1989 to 2003, who were hospitalized for first psychotic illnesses (N = 500) were diagnosed by ICD-10 criteria at baseline and 24 months, on the basis of extensive prospective assessments, to evaluate the longitudinal stability of specific categorical diagnoses and predictors of diagnostic change.Diagnostic stability averaged 90.4%, ranking as follows: schizoaffective disorder (100.0%) > mania with psychosis (99.0%) > mixed affective episode (94.9%) > schizophrenia (94.6%) > delusional disorder (88.2%) > severe depressive episode with psychotic symptoms (85.2%) > acute psychosis with/without schizophrenia symptoms = unspecified psychosis (all 66.7%) > acute schizophrenia-like psychosis (28.6%). Diagnoses changed by 24 months of follow-up to schizoaffective disorder (37.5%), bipolar disorder (25.0%), schizophrenia (16.7%), or unspecified nonorganic psychosis (8.3%), mainly through emerging affective features. By logistic regression, diagnostic change was associated with Schneiderian first-rank psychotic symptoms at intake > lack of premorbid substance use.We found some psychotic disorder diagnoses to be more stable by ICD-10 than DSM-IV criteria in the same patients, with implications for revisions of both diagnostic systems.Effect of diagnostic criteria on the ratio of male to female schizophrenic patients.Contrary to earlier epidemiological data, recent evidence points to a significantly greater proportion of men than women among schizophrenic patients diagnosed by current restrictive criteria. In this study, the authors analyzed the effect of using six different diagnostic systems (varying in their stringency) on the male to female ratio of schizophrenia among 387 inpatients. Diagnostic criteria representing a broad conceptualization of schizophrenia, such as the New Haven Schizophrenia Index, consistently yielded equal rates of schizophrenia among men and women. Those diagnostic systems representing more stringently defined schizophrenia, such as the Research Diagnostic Criteria, consistently yielded a male to female ratio significantly greater than the male to female ratio of the total sample.First-rank symptoms and Bleuler's basic symptoms. New results in applying the polydiagnostic approach.By comparing six different operational diagnostic systems (International Classification of Diseases, Diagnostic and Statistical Manual; 3rd ed., Research Diagnostic Criteria, St. Louis criteria, Taylor criteria and Vienna Research Criteria), the data presented in this paper illustrate how attribution to various categories of functional psychoses varies according to the applied algorithms. Bleuler's basic symptoms are obviously considered by all of the compared systems to be more significant for attribution to schizophrenia than first-rank symptoms.Diagnostic evaluation of Schneider first rank symptoms of schizophrenia among three groups of Iranians.Diagnostic agreement of schizophrenia spectrum disorders among chronic patients with functional psychoses.To investigate whether diagnostic agreement across different diagnostic systems improves in a sample of chronic patients suffering from functional psychosis compared to first-admitted patients.Among 353 patients with a history of functional psychosis, a subset of 100 individuals (35 women and 65 men) were randomly sampled and assessed using the Operational Criteria Checklist for Psychotic Illness and Affective Illness (OPCRIT). Based on the OPCRIT diagnoses the subjects suffering from schizophrenia and schizophrenia spectrum disorders according to seven diagnostic systems were identified. Diagnostic agreement was assessed using unweighted kappa-statistics and pairwise concordance rates (CR).High diagnostic agreement of schizophrenia was observed across the ICD-10 and DSM systems (CR >0.70, kappa >0.70), which all had a significantly lower concordance to the St. Louis Criteria (SLC), research diagnostic criteria and Schneider's first rank symptoms (FRS) (0.32< CR <0.66; -0.10< kappa <0.51). Agreement on schizophrenia across all systems was observed for one fourth of the subjects. Elimination of the diagnostic impact of 'co-occurrence of psychotic and affective symptoms' excluded FRS standalone individuals from the sample, increased overall homogeneity and resulted in a dichotomized sample according to SLC (46 positive vs. 47 negative). SLC status could be predicted in 78% of cases by four items relating to family history and psychosocial function previous to the onset of illness. Similarly high pairwise CR were observed for schizophrenia spectrum disorders across all diagnostic systems.This study demonstrates that diagnostic agreement is higher among chronic patients than that observed in subjects with a recent onset of psychosis, although considerable discordance is also observed in this chronic sample. However, the discordance among chronic patients with functional psychosis largely derives from the different emphasis that diagnostic systems place on co-occurrence of psychotic and affective symptoms. This may have serious epistemological consequences, thus underlining the conventional nature of the present schizophrenia diagnoses and the need for biologically founded diagnostic criteria.Schneiderian first rank symptoms in a sample of schizophrenic patients in Egypt.Schneiderian first rank symptoms are included in the most influential operative diagnostic criteria, such as the ICD-10 and the DSM-IV. Many studies have examined their prevalence in the West, but their prevalence in non-Western countries still needs to be explored given that cultural beliefs are so different.The aim of this study is to shed some light on Schneiderian first rank symptoms (FRS) as they occur in patients with schizophrenia in Egypt.Forty-two patients were interviewed, their demographic characteristics studied and FRS elicited. The SPSS computer program was used to analyse the data.The prevalence rate of FRS was found to be 67%, which is similar to previous studies both in the East and the West. The study also showed that demographic variables had no significant relation to the prevalence of FRS except for nationality and social status.Schneiderian first rank symptoms transcend cultural barriers. However, strong cultural beliefs about the influence of supernatural forces on humans should nonetheless be carefully considered in eliciting delusions of control, influence or passivity.Psychotic symptom patterns and the diagnosis of schizophrenia.In comparing 101 psychotic patients subtyped by DSM-III criteria into paranoia, schizophrenia, schizoaffective, and affective disorders, we failed to distinguish them on the basis of delusional and hallucinatory experiences. These 'productive', 'positive' or 'irritative' symptoms--which the literature tends to link with temporolimbic dysfunction--did not appear specifically linked to schizophrenia. By contrast, 'negative' or 'deficit' symptoms--which the literature tends to relate to frontal lobe dysfunction--appeared more specific--especially for the disorganized subtype of schizophrenia. Although these data tend to support Bleulerian over Schneiderian conceptualization of schizophrenia, the heterogeneity of neuropsychological deficits implied in the negative symptom complexes limits the nosologic utility of the rubric of schizophrenia so defined.Factor structure and familiality of first-rank symptoms in sibling pairs with schizophrenia and schizoaffective disorder.Since their introduction as diagnostic criteria by Schneider in 1937, nuclear symptoms have played a key role in concepts of schizophrenia, but their relationship to each other and to genetic predisposition has been unclear.To ascertain the factor structure and familiality of nuclear symptoms.Nuclear (Schneiderian) symptoms were extracted from case notes and interviews in a study of 103 sibling pairs with DSM-III-R schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder.Principal components analysis demonstrated two major factors: one, accounting for about 50% of the variance, groups thought withdrawal, insertion and broadcasting, with delusions of control; and the second, accounting for < 20% of the variance, groups together third-person voices, thought echo and running commentary. Factor I was significantly correlated within sibling pairs.The correlation within sibling pairs suggests that, contrary to the conclusion of some previous studies, some nuclear symptoms do show a degree of familiality and therefore perhaps heritability.A polydiagnostic and dimensional comparison of epileptic psychoses and schizophrenia spectrum disorders.After establishing the validity of the Japanese version of the Operational Criteria Checklist for Psychotic Illness (OPCRIT), we applied it to 58 consecutive patients with epileptic psychoses (index group) and to age- and sex-matched controls with schizophrenia spectrum disorders (control group). Compared with the control group, the index group had a low family history of schizophrenia, high premorbid personality disorder and unemployment, abrupt or acute onset of psychosis, good recovery with single or multiple episodes, and low deterioration from a premorbid level of function. From 9% to 52% of the index group and 38% to 84% of the control group were diagnosed with schizophrenia according to the operational criteria used. The percentages of patients diagnosed with schizophrenia based on various diagnostic criteria in the two groups were similar. In the index group, a diagnosis of schizophrenia was more commonly made among patients with inter-ictal psychosis than among those with post-ictal psychosis. An exploratory factor analysis identified five factor solutions of manic, negative, depressive, vegetative, and positive symptoms. Although positive and negative factor values were lower in the index group than in the control group, the two groups shared a similar factor profile. These results indicate that the difference in symptomatology between the two groups was quantitative rather than qualitative.Prognostic value of initial subtype in schizophrenic disorders.The prognostic value of the subtype diagnosis at the initial episode was investigated in 148 narrowly defined schizophrenic patients. Every initial episode was classified according to multiple criteria: DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the positive/negative dichotomy, and Schneider's first rank symptoms. Patients were followed up on average 23 years later (range 10-50 years). Different aspects of long-term outcome were evaluated (global functioning, social adjustment, negative social consequences). In 93% of the patients persisting alterations were found at the end of the observation time. The influence of the predominant clinical features at the initial episode on various aspects of long-term outcome was found to differ depending on which of the four diagnostic systems was used. The highest power for discrimination was found for the subtypes of DSM-III-R, while the presence of first rank symptoms had no prognostic value. It was found that patients with an initial paranoid or positive episode had a significantly better long-term outcome than patients initially having a disorganised/hebephrenic or catatonic episode. The frequency of negative social consequences was not influenced by the initial subtype, with the exception of permanent hospitalisation.Inter-rater reliability of twelve diagnostic systems of schizophrenia.The present and past symptomatology of 31 chronic schizophrenics was rated by four independent judges, two experienced clinical psychiatrists and two psychiatric residents, in a context more representative of actual clinical practice than most research studies. Ratings were made on 64 symptoms derived from 12 diagnostic systems, based on either live or videotaped interviews for present symptomatology and case records for past symptomatology. Inter-rater reliabilities were higher for present than for past symptoms, and in general did not approach those reported for highly trained raters. There were no differences between live and videotaped interviews. Diagnostic systems differed widely in rater agreement. The most consistent across both past and present symptomatology were the systems of Langfeldt, Schneider, and DSM-III, for which the level of reliability was consistent with other studies.Screening criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia in deaf patients.Confusion about symptoms of schizophrenia in deaf patients leads to misdiagnosis or failure of diagnosis in some individuals. Consequently, we used Schneider's symptoms of schizophrenia, the International Pilot Study of Schizophrenia's list of discriminating symptoms of schizophrenia, and a symptom checklist from DSM-III to evaluate retrospectively 13 deaf adult schizophrenic patients in whom diagnosis were made using DSM-II. Fifteen signs and symptoms were identified in those schizophrenic patients; six symptoms (poor insight, lability of affect, poverty of content, poor rapport, vagueness, and inability to complete a course of action) are usual in nonpsychotic as well as psychotic deaf patients. The nine "primary" symptoms (loss of ego boundaries, delusional perceptions, restricted affect, illogicality, abnormal explanations, hallucinations, inappropriate affect, remoteness from reality, and ambivalence) are useful screening criteria in the diagnosis of schizophrenia in deaf patients.Schneider-oriented versus Conrad-oriented psychiatric diagnosis in the same German clinic.The Chair of the University Nervenklinik in Homburg/Saar was held by Klaus Conrad from 1949-58 and by H.-H. Meyer, a former pupil and colleague of Kurt Schneider, from 1962-72. As the catchment area and admission policy of the clinic remained substantially unchanged throughout, comparison of the relative proportions of all admissions allocated to different diagnostic categories in 1949-58 and 1962-72 can be used to elucidate the similarities and differences between Conrad's and Schneider's diagnostic criteria. The results of this comparison indicate that Schneider's concept of schizophrenia was broader than Conrad's, and his concept of manic-depressive depression more restricted. More detailed comparisons are complicated by differences in nomenclature and in the varieties of functional mental illness recognized in the two periods. However, it seems that Conrad's concept of mania was wider only when the atypical schizophrenia-like psychoses diagnosed during the Conrad era were added to the Conrad-oriented cases of mania; when this was not done, the Schneiderian concept of mania was broader.Prognostic implications of six alternative definitions of schizophrenia.The ability of six different operational definitions of schizophrenia to identify prospectively patients whose eventual prognosis would be poor was studied using data from a six-year follow-up of a series of 134 patients with functional psychoses. All six definitions were more successful at predicting a poor symptomatic outcome than a poor social outcome. Spitzer's Research Diagnostic Criteria, Carpenter's flexible criteria, and Langfeldt's criteria predicted a poor outcome as well as the original clinical diagnoses and were considerably better than the New Haven criteria, Schneider's first rank symptoms, or the computer program Catego.Clinical polydiagnostic studies in a large Swedish pedigree with schizophrenia.A polydiagnostic computerized diagnostic system for psychosis was used in a Swedish family complex, and 51 patients with psychiatric symptomatology were examined with eight main diagnostic systems for schizophrenia and three systems for schizophrenic subgroups. All patients fulfilled the criteria for schizophrenia according to Taylor et al., 50 according to Carpenter, 41 according to RDC, and 31 of the 51 according to DSM-III and DSM-III-R. The hypothesis that the patients in the Swedish family complex differ from other phenotypes of schizophrenia must be refuted based on the data of the present study.The validity of schizophrenia diagnosis in the Finnish Hospital Discharge Register: findings from a 10-year birth cohort sample.The purpose of this study was to investigate the diagnostic validity of schizophrenia in the Finnish Hospital Discharge Register (FHDR) with a large, epidemiologically representative sample using a multidiagnostic approach (DSM-III-R, DSM-IV, ICD-10), and to find additional criteria that could be used to improve the validity of schizophrenia diagnosis in future register-based research that utilizes the FHDR. The study population consisted of all individuals (n=877) who were born in Helsinki, Finland, between 1 January 1951 and 31 December 1960, and who had had at least one diagnosis of schizophrenia, schizophreniform disorder or schizoaffective disorder in the FHDR. All their available hospital case notes were collected. The total number of subjects for whom case notes were obtained was 806. We used the OPCRIT system (version 3.4) to produce diagnoses according to ICD-10, DSM-III-R and DSM-IV criteria based on the information extracted from the hospital case notes. We examined the distribution of the DSM-III-R, DSM-IV and ICD-10 diagnoses generated by the OPCRIT and calculated the proportion of individuals who received the same diagnosis in the FHDR and in the OPCRIT assessment. The proportion of subjects who received a core schizophrenia spectrum diagnosis (schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder or schizophreniform disorder) in both the FHDR and OPCRIT assessment varied between 75% (DSM-III-R criteria) and 78% (ICD-10 criteria). Of the subjects with a narrow schizophrenia diagnosis in the FHDR, between 74% (DSM-IV) and 78% (ICD-10) received a diagnosis of schizophrenia in the reassessment depending on the diagnostic criteria applied. Eighty per cent of those who had received a core schizophrenia spectrum FHDR diagnosis after 1982 (vs. 56% of those who had received their last schizophrenia diagnosis in 1982 or before) received a DSM-IV diagnosis of core schizophrenia spectrum disorder. Of the 58 subjects in the sample who had been given at various times diagnoses of both core schizophrenia diagnosis and bipolar I diagnosis in FHDR, 43% received a core schizophrenia spectrum diagnosis according to DSM-IV criteria. The validity of the FHDR schizophrenia diagnosis is acceptable for large-scale register studies and comparable with that of other Nordic registers. Diagnostic validity can be further improved by selecting subjects who have core schizophrenia spectrum disorder as the latest diagnosis, by omitting cases diagnosed before 1982, and by excluding cases with a register diagnoses of both a core schizophrenia spectrum and bipolar I disorder.Long-term course of schizophrenic illness: Bleuler's study reconsidered.The influential 1972 study by Manfred Bleuler on the long-term course of schizophrenic illness has been reconsidered. The authors tested the diagnosis of schizophrenia in all patients and investigated how the distribution of the types of illness course and outcome would change after exclusion of patients whose diagnosis of schizophrenia could not be confirmed by modern diagnostic standards.Clinical charts and Bleuler's research notes on the original sample were assessed, and all patients were rediagnosed with the help of DSM-IV, DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC), Schneider's criteria, and an operationalized version of the criteria of Eugen Bleuler.The diagnosis of schizophrenia was not confirmed in about 30% of the sample; the majority of these patients were rediagnosed with schizoaffective disorder. High diagnostic agreement was found between DSM-IV, DSM-III-R, ICD-10, and RDC; there was much less agreement with Bleuler's and Schneider's criteria. After exclusion of patients whose schizophrenia diagnosis was not confirmed, the proportion of patients with undulating course and recovery slightly decreased, and the proportion of patients with severe end state slightly increased. Nevertheless, the distribution of the types of long-term course did not significantly change, and even among patients with strictly defined schizophrenia, half had an undulating course with remissions and 12%-15% recovered.Schizophrenic illness remains heterogeneous with regard to illness course and outcome even when narrowly diagnosed with the help of modern operationalized diagnostic criteria. Contemporary differentiation between schizophrenic and schizoaffective disorders is prognostically valid.Concurrent validity of the OPCRIT diagnostic system. Comparison of OPCRIT diagnoses with consensus best-estimate lifetime diagnoses.OPCRIT (a suite of computer programs that allow data entry and generate diagnoses according to 12 operational diagnostic systems) is used in a wide range of psychiatric research including both European Science Foundation and NIMH research initiatives in the molecular genetics of mental disorders. We examined its concurrent validity in 100 subjects collected for linkage studies of Bipolar Disorder and Schizophrenia.We compared diagnoses generated by OPCRIT from data rated by two trained clinicians with diagnoses made according to consensus, best-estimate, lifetime procedures by the same two raters according to DSM-III-R and RDC classifications.Good to excellent agreement was achieved between OPCRIT diagnoses and those made by consensus best-estimate procedures.OPCRIT provides a convenient, reliable, rapid and valid approach to polydiagnostic assessment that can be used as an adjunct to conventional (but time consulting) best-estimate consensus diagnostic procedures.Schizophrenia: diagnostic criteria and outcome.The files of a cohort of schizophrenic patients who were admitted to hospital for the first time in their lives in 1963, and who were representative of cases in a large unselected population, were examined , first by exclusion criteria, and then by the diagnostic criteria of Schneider's first-rank symptoms, Feighner et al's criteria, and the New Haven Schizophrenia Index (NHSI). Forty-three such cases were found who were schizophrenic on at least two sets of criteria, and who were followed up in 1977. Examination of the outcome showed no relationship with FRS presence or absence or number of first-rank symptoms, nor with the NHSI score, but did show a relationship to the Feighner et al criteria and an even stronger relationship to a simple score derived from these criteria.The DSM-III concepts of schizophrenic disorder and schizophreniform disorder. A clinical and prognostic evaluation.Consecutive new patients presenting at a Nigerian psychiatric unit over a 14-month period and fulfilling the DSM-III criteria for schizophreniform disorder, (active) schizophrenia and residual schizophrenia were studied. There were no differences between the three groups with respect to background social data. The schizophreniform patients had a lower incidence of previous psychotic episodes. There were no differences between the first two groups with respect to the distribution of PSE symptoms and signs, Schneider's First Rank Symptoms, or severity of psychopathology. Initial clinical outcome, and longer-term clinical and social outcome, assessed 25-38 months after index presentation, was best in the schizophreniform patients and worst in the patients with residual schizophrenia. The findings are consistent with schizophreniform disorder lying on a spectrum of schizophrenic disorders. They also highlight inadequacies in mental health services in Nigeria and other developing countries.Frequency and predictive values of first rank symptoms at baseline among 362 young adult patients with first-episode schizophrenia Results from the Danish OPUS study.To investigate the frequency of the Schneiderian First Rank Symptoms (FRSs) in a representative group of patients with first-episode schizophrenia and to analyse the predictive value of these symptoms in relation to psychopathology, work situation, depression, dependency and admission after 2 years of treatment.547 patients were included in the Danish OPUS trial. A subgroup of these, namely the 388 patients who fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia (ICD-10), was included in this study. Data from SCAN interviews were used to describe the frequency of the different first rank symptoms and to compare the characteristics of the patients with and without FRSs.FRSs were very common among these patients with first-episode schizophrenia. Only 16% reported no FRSs at all. Almost half of the patients had experienced commenting or discussing voices, and more than 40% had experienced loud thoughts. More patients with than without FRSs had some kind of substance abuse. FRSs at baseline did not predict the level of scores in the psychotic, negative or disorganized dimension after 2 years. Having FRSs at baseline was related to a significantly lower number of days of admission during the two-year period, but was not associated with antipsychotic medication or depression after 2 years.FRSs are very common among first-episode psychosis patients, but their predictive value seems to be limited with respect to outcome measures like psychopathology, work or substance abuse. However, FRSs did predict a lower mean of days of admission.A polydiagnostic approach to self-perceived cognitive disorders in schizophrenia.The relationship between the self-perceived cognitive disorders (SPCD) assessed using the Frankfurt Complaint Questionnaire (FCQ) and 21 definitions of schizophrenia was studied in a sample of 118 consecutively admitted patients. The FCQ total score was significantly associated (p < 0.05) with the presence of Schneider's, Yusin's and Present State Examination criteria of schizophrenia. A significant association, in this case negative, was also found between the FCQ total score and the presence of the DSM-III-R criteria of schizophrenia. The results suggest that the SPCDs are more associated with Schneider-related criteria than with chronic or deficit models of schizophrenia. It was also found that the female sex as well as the presence of insight were significantly associated with a greater number of SPCDs.Diagnostic overlap in schizophrenia research: relation to outcome predictors and family history.Five sets of criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia were compared on 47 hospitalized patients who fit New York Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC) for chronic schizophrenia. The other diagnostic systems used were the Flexible System. Feighner Criteria, New Haven Schizophrenia Index (NHSI), and Taylor-Abrams (TA) Criteria. The NSHI, the broadest system examined, fit all of the patients studied. In contrast, only 30 patients (63% of the sample) were diagnosed schizophrenic using TA Criteria. When the Strauss-Carpenter prognostic scale was used, patients who fit TA Criteria for schizophrenia did not differ in the prognostic scores from the remainder of the sample. In addition, the two groups did not differ in the familial rate of schizophrenia spectrum disorders. The usefulness of narrow versus broad diagnostic criteria in schizophrenia research is discussed.Heterogeneity of delusional syndromes: diagnostic criteria and course prognosis.In addition to genetic findings and treatment response, the course prognosis is also meant to be a possible validating criterion for diagnosis and diagnostic systems. In our study we used the polydiagnostic approach (i.e. the simultaneous application of various criteria for diagnosing a given disorder to one and the same population) to test the ability of several diagnostic systems to create homogeneous groups regarding the course (episodic/chronic). We applied Schneider's FRS, ICD-9, DSM-III, Spitzer's RDC and the Vienna Research Criteria to 90 patients with the diagnosis of delusional syndrome (aside from any nosological classification), who underwent 6-9 years of follow-up. At the index examination, schizophrenia was most frequently diagnosed with Schneider's FRS, which apparently encompasses a very heterogeneous group of patients regarding psychopathology and course. Diagnostic systems which allowed the diagnosis of affective disorders despite the presence of mood-incongruent delusional symptomatology (DSM-III, RDC, Vienna Criteria) or offered the diagnosis of schizoaffective disorder (DSM-III, RDC) succeeded in separating subgroups with an episodic course on a statistically significant level. In ICD-9 this significance appeared only after exclusion of the schizoaffective cases from the group of schizophrenias. Our data thus uphold the old rule of thumb that affective symptomatology apparently has a very high prognostic value regarding the course of the illness and is in this respect superior to productive symptomatology (such as delusions and hallucinations), still taken to be pathognomonic for schizophrenia by some of the diagnostic criteria under study. This aspect warrants further investigation and should be taken into account in the development and improvement of diagnostic manuals (e.g. ICD-10, DSM-IV).The polydiagnostic interview: a structured interview for the polydiagnostic classification of psychiatric patients.A structured interview (PODI) for the polydiagnostic evaluation of affective and schizophrenic disorders is presented. The interview includes elements of the Structured Clinical Interview for DSM-III (SCID) and of the Present State Examination (PSE). The central idea of this interview is to break down complex criteria into their elements, to assess a wide area of such elements, and to recombine them by a computer program according to different algorithms that are included in a greater number of operational diagnoses. Reliability data will be presented which show sufficiently high kappa and Yule coefficients for a selected set of diagnostic criteria for depressive, manic and psychotic disorders. The applicability of the PODI was established in about 180 interviews.Prognostic validity of the cycloid psychoses. A prospective follow-up study.In a prospective 4-year follow-up study, 26 out of 31 patients initially diagnosed as cycloid psychoses were investigated (anxiety-happiness psychosis n = 15; confusion psychosis n = 8; motility psychosis n = 3). Patients were independently interviewed by two clinical researchers. 61.5% showed one or several 'first-rank symptoms' according to Schneider. In addition, the SADS-LA was applied for RDC and DSM-IIIR diagnoses. According to these classification systems most of the patients were diagnosed as schizophrenic or schizoaffective. Personal interview as well as application of the Strauss-Carpenter Outcome Scale indicated a highly favorable clinical outcome, i.e. lack of affective or behavioral defective states in literally all patients of the study. These results justify the distinction of the cycloid psychoses as a nosological entity in general and--less convincingly--of the three subtypes of cycloid psychoses.The predictive validity of a diagnosis of schizophrenia. A report from the International Study of Schizophrenia (ISoS) coordinated by the World Health Organization and the Department of Psychiatry, University of Nottingham.Outcome is important in the validation of psychiatric diagnosis, as most disorders lack clinicopathological correlates. We describe the predictive validity of four definitions of schizophrenia (DSM-III-R, ICD-10, ICD-9 and CATEGO S+), in a representative cohort of patients selected during their first episode of psychosis.Each definition of schizophrenia was applied to 99 patients. Their respective ability to predict 13-year outcome (Global Assessment of Functioning scales) was assessed.DSM-III-R and ICD-10 diagnoses of schizophrenia have high predictive validity for long-term outcome, and both provide relatively stable diagnoses. ICD-9 is reasonably good at predicting disability, but not symptoms, and CATEGO S+ showed no predictive validity. Adding six-month duration criteria to ICD-10, ICD-9 and CATEGO S+ improved their predictive validity, and removing the six-month duration criterion from DSM-III-R commensurately reduced predictive validity.Modern diagnostic systems (DSM-III-R and ICD-10) have high predictive validity, and are superior to ICD-9. The six-month duration criterion of DSM-III-R schizophrenia accounts for its predictive validity and stability over 13 years, but restricts its use in first-episode studies. The one-month duration criterion of ICD-10 is less restrictive, without major compromises in predictive validity or stability.Acute psychotic reactions in Caribbean-born patients.A prospective study of patients with religious delusions identified 24 West Indian and West African patients. Those who had none of Schneider's first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia (principally West Indians) differed from those who did by virtue of early religious commitment, life-long religious experiences, an acute admission precipitated by social events, a greater chance of having their diagnosis changed, less than 10 different PSE syndromes, the absence of 'twentieth-century' delusions, and the presentation of malevolent witchcraft as the sole explanation of the episode. It is suggested that this group can usefully be considered as demonstrating an acute psychotic reaction of the type previously described in Africa and the Caribbean.Schizophrenia in ICD-10: a field trial of suggested diagnostic guidelines.A tenth version of the International Classification of Diseases (ICD-10) is currently being prepared by the World Health Organization, who called for field trials of suggested guidelines. A field trial of the guidelines for the diagnosis of schizophrenia is presented. There is a consistency with ICD-9-based diagnosis. Schneider's First-Rank Symptoms (FRS) acquire special importance in the suggested guidelines, but caution is necessary in detecting these symptoms in cultures in which socioculturally shared beliefs bear a resemblance to FRS.Outcome of schizophrenia in India using various diagnostic systems.A group of 112 patients diagnosed to be suffering from schizophrenia according to ICD-9 concept of this disorder were followed-up for a period of 18-30 months. Five diagnostic systems for schizophrenia: CATEGO, Research Diagnostic Criteria, Feighner's Criteria, DSM-III and Schneider's First Rank Symptoms were also applied to the study group at the beginning of the investigation. The outcome was assessed in the areas of clinical improvement, course, severity of illness and work. The course of the disorder and outcome in various definitions did not reveal significant variability though patients diagnosed to be schizophrenics according to DSM-III tended to display more psychopathology and impaired work efficiency at the time of follow-up.The reassessment of chronic patients previously diagnosed as schizophrenic.Sixty-one outpatients with clinical diagnoses of schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder were systematically reevaluated with a structured historical diagnostic interview, the Schedule for Affective Disorders and Schizophrenia-Lifetime Version, and with a review of their charts. Research diagnoses were then constructed by applying Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC) to the interview data and seven diagnostic systems to the chart data. Of the 61 patients, 43 (70.5%) were again recognized to be schizophrenic by the RDC applied to the interview data and 39 (63.5%) met chart criteria. Fifty-one patients (83.6%) were rediagnosed as schizophrenic by at least one of these approaches (excluding the NHSI chart criteria). There was, however, great variation in rediagnostic assignment because of variations in the diagnostic criteria and chart data. Many of the patients who did not meet criteria for schizophrenia met criteria for affective disorder. Patients were assigned to one of four categories according to whether interview or chart rediagnosis was positive or negative for schizophrenia. This categorization was used to search for factors that might account for patients who did not receive a rediagnosis of schizophrenia.The diagnostic status of first-rank symptoms.In the International Statistical Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision(ICD-10) and Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorder, Third and Fourth Edition(DSM-III-IV), the presence of one of Schneider "first-rank symptoms" (FRS) is symptomatically sufficient for the schizophrenia diagnosis. Yet, it has been claimed that FRS may also be found in the nonschizophrenic conditions, and therefore, they are not specific or diagnostic for schizophrenia. This review was made to clarify the issue of diagnostic specificity.(1) A critical review of FRS studies published in English between 1970 and 2005. (2) A highlight of the 5 most frequently cited studies identified in the Web of Science. (3) Theoretical implications of the epistemological issues of FRS.The reviewed studies do not allow for either a reconfirmation or a rejection of Schneider's claims about FRS. The sources of disagreement between the studies are (1) including or excluding acute patients with potential degradation of consciousness; (2) assessing or not the phenomenological context; (3) assessing patients in different stages of their illness evolution; and (4) differential emphasis on mood symptoms and history of psychiatric symptoms.Both DSM-IV and ICD-10 emphasize FRS to a degree that is not supported by the empirical evidence. Until the status of FRS is clarified in depth, we suggest that the FRS, as these are currently defined, should be de-emphasized in the next revisions of our diagnostic systems. Future studies aiming at validation of FRS as diagnostic features need to apply a phenomenological perspective and include a homogenous group of patients across a wide spectrum of diagnoses.A study of Schneider's first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia in Nigerian patients.A prospective evaluation of Schneider's first-rank symptoms in 56 Nigerians with RDC schizophrenia gave a prevalence of 73%. The presence of first-rank symptoms was unrelated to schizophrenic subtypes, duration or severity of illness. While some of the symptoms correlate with age of patients, the pattern of inter-correlations among them supports previous views about their empirical heterogeneity.Subtypes in schizophrenic disorders: frequencies in long-term course and premorbid features.The subclassification of schizophrenic disorders according to four diagnostic systems (DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the positive vs. negative dichotomy and Schneider's first rank symptoms) was compared over the long-term course of the disease in 148 narrowly defined schizophrenic patients. A total of 595 episodes were classified over a mean observation period of 23 years (range 10-50 years). Initially, paranoid/positive subtypes predominated, while later in the course episodes fulfilling the symptomatological criteria of residual/negative subtypes became more frequent. Disorganised/hebephrenic and catatonic subtypes were found to be rare. Some premorbid features were investigated as non-symptomatological validators for subclassification. Significant differences were found with regard to age at onset. Patients whose first episode was paranoid or positive had the highest age at onset. Patients with initial disorganised/hebephrenic or "residual" episodes had the most unfavourable premorbid social adjustment, even when the influence of age at onset was discounted. The diagnostic systems investigated showed similarities and differences as a result of the underlying concepts. Methodological implications are discussed.The Cantabria first episode schizophrenia study: a summary of general findings.This article describes the general findings of the initial cross-sectional stage of a prospective follow-up study of all first episodes of schizophrenia that occurred in the Autonomous Community of Cantabria over a 2-year period and that established contact with any mental health service. The project comprises: i) a 2-year cross-sectional stage, in which the sample was gathered and studied with structured psychiatric instruments such as the Present State Examination and the Scales for the Assessment of Negative and Positive Symptoms (SANS and SAPS), and; ii) a continuous follow-up. We detected, in the risk age ranged of 15-54 years, an incidence of 1.9 per 10,000 inhabitants per year for schizophrenia and of 1.3 per 10,000 inhabitants per year for the S+ CATEGO diagnosis, without any significant gender difference of morbidity. The mean age for the total schizophrenic population was 26 years, being significantly higher in women than in men. In contrast with what happens with marital status, type of household or urban/rural way of life, there was no gender difference in relation to the other sociodemographic variables. The way in which nosological and clinical variables are associated with first episodes of schizophrenia was also examined in this study. We found that 75% of patients reached a maximum CATEGO-ID level, 71% received a S+ CATEGO diagnosis, 59% presented first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia and that the percentage of a schizophrenic negative syndrome, as identified by the SANS and SAPS, was very low.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Bizarre delusions and DSM-IV schizophrenia.The present study investigated whether schizophrenia patients with and without DSM-IV bizarre delusions, categorized as bizarre delusions of Schneiderian first rank symptoms (SBD) and as non-Schneiderian bizarre delusions (non-SBD), differed on demographic or clinical features, in view of the weight given to bizarre delusions in the diagnosis of schizophrenia. One hundred and twenty-nine in-patients with schizophrenia were assessed systematically for both types of bizarre delusions on the five domains of psychopathology of the Positive and Negative Syndrome Scale (PANSS; delusions/hallucinations, thought disorder/disorganization, excitement, negative symptoms and depressive symptoms) and for extrapyramidal side-effects. Inter-rater reliabilities for SBD and non-SBD were assessed and were exceptionally high (kappa value 0.85 and 0.92, respectively). Neither SBD nor non-SBD were associated with any demographic or non-PANSS clinical characteristics tested. However, the presence of non-SBD was significantly associated with more severe psychopathology in all five domains of the PANSS, whereas the presence of SBD was significantly associated with more severe psychopathology in three domains only: delusions/hallucinations, thought disorder/disorganization and depressive symptoms. However, patients with only SBD did not differ from patients with only non-SBD on any demographic or clinical variables, including five psychopathological domains. These findings suggest that, despite showing more severe symptoms, patients with DSM-IV bizarre delusions do not constitute a clinically distinguishable subgroup.Diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia: reliabilities and agreement between systems.We compared the joint frequencies and reliabilities of the following sets of criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia: the New Haven Schizophrenia Index: the Carpenter, Strauss, Bartko (4-, 5-, 6-, and 7-item) system; DSM-III; Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC; full and chronic); the Feighner system; and the 1975 criteria of Taylor and Abrams. The systems, of essentially equal reliability, varied sevenfold in their rates of diagnosing schizophrenia. Patients in whom schizophrenia was diagnosed by the lower-rate systems were likely to receive the same diagnosis by the higher-rate systems. This tends not to be the cases when an affective syndrome is present.Diagnosis of schizophrenia.Case records of ninety consecutive first lifetime admissions with a hospital diagnosis of schizophrenia were examined for Schneiderian first rank symptoms, the Feighner diagnostic criteria, and the New Haven Schizophrenia Index. Diagnostic exclusion criteria were developed and applied. It is concluded that the hospital diagnosis of schizophrenia is likely to be too broad. Each diagnostic system can increase accuracy of diagnosis, but their exclusion criteria are too vague and the system would be improved by using those given here. Each diagnostic system selects similar groups of patients, and can be applied retrospectively to adequate case records.Heritability of Schneider's first-rank symptoms.Schneider's first-rank symptoms are given particular weight when making a diagnosis of schizophrenia, but the nuclear syndrome, characterised by one or more first-rank symptoms, has been found previously to have no heritability.To estimate the heritability of the nuclear syndrome.A total of 224 twin pairs (106 monozygotic, 118 same-gender dizygotic) were ascertained from the Maudsley Twin Register in London via probands with any psychosis. Lifetime-ever first-rank symptoms were rated using the OPCRIT checklist. Probandwise concordance rates were calculated for the nuclear syndrome and a heritability estimate was derived from biometric model fitting.Probandwise concordance rates were 13/49 (26.5%) for monozygotic and 0/45 to 2/46 (0.0-4.3%) for dizygotic pairs. The heritability estimate for the best-fitting model was 71% (95% CI 57-82).These results indicate that the nuclear syndrome shows substantial heritability, although this is slightly lower than that for schizophrenia as defined by the DSM and ICD systems.Operational definitions of schizophrenia: what do they identify?Several studies have shown that different systems for diagnosing schizophrenia produce diagnoses with relatively low agreement. This, however, does not necessarily imply that the different systems are identifying conceptually different diagnostic groups. They may, in fact, identify a single entity, but with different degrees of accuracy. One-hundred ninety-six inpatients were diagnosed by multiple diagnostic systems. The pattern of relationship among the diagnoses was studied with latent class analysis, a statistical methodology which has not previously been applied to this type of data. Results indicated that the diagnoses of the Research Diagnostic Criteria, Flexible 6, Schneider, and 1978 Taylor and Abrams diagnostic systems all estimated a single underlying diagnosis. The Taylor and Abrams system identified this core diagnosis with high accuracy. The results also suggest that blunted affect and the absence of an affective syndrome are related to latent class schizophrenia, while the presence of only nonspecific delusions and/or hallucinations is not related. The appropriateness of the latent class definition of schizophrenia for selecting patients for research is discussed.Putative psychotic symptoms in the Mexican American population: prevalence and co-occurrence with psychiatric disorders.It is reported that Latin Americans describe culturally normative experiences or express putative psychotic symptoms in medical and mental health treatment settings that complicate the diagnostic process. Previous research reported that Latinos were more likely than European Americans and African Americans to have their diagnoses changed from schizophrenia to other disorders. This study describes the prevalence and likelihood of putative psychotic symptoms being expressed independent of any psychiatric disorder or co-occurring with common disorders such as depression or anxiety within a Mexican American population sample. Epidemiologic data of the Mexican American Prevalence and Services Survey (N = 3012) were used to contrast rates and patterns of putatively psychotic features among adults by demographic variables and diagnostic status using DSM-III-R criteria and receipt of treatment. Putative psychotic symptoms were reported by 17% of US-born and 7% of immigrants without disorders, and by 38% of US-born and 28% of immigrants with lifetime disorders, totaling 18% lifetime prevalence for the entire study population of Mexican Americans. First-rank Schneiderian symptoms were higher in those with a disorder compared with those without a disorder for both sexes. The results of this study indicate that putative psychotic symptoms are common among Mexican Americans, and their presence is a strong precautionary signal for evaluating clinicians to correctly distinguish whether putative psychotic symptoms are indicators of nonorganic psychoses or other psychiatric disorders, or are simply cultural expressions. Research is needed to identify the determinants of misdiagnosis in clinical practice, and guidelines are needed to assist clinicians.The positive triad of schizophrenic symptoms. Its statistical properties and its relationship to 13 traditional diagnostic systems.Using data from the WHO International Pilot Study of Schizophrenia and from our own previously reported series of 120 patients receiving treatment for schizophrenia, we ascertained the degree of agreement between 13 different systems for diagnosing schizophrenia. We identified a triad of symptoms similar to that from the International Pilot Study: auditory hallucinations, passivity feelings, and disturbances of affect. This triad correlated very strongly with the diagnosis of schizophrenia as determined by the 13 diagnostic systems, as well as with response to fluphenazine in our series. The triad should serve as a core set of symptoms in the study of schizophrenic illness. It represents the leading phenomena in a group of patients having what is generally considered to be schizophrenia, although it does not provide a definitive diagnosis. Evidence is needed on its specificity.Problem of diagnosis in postmortem brain studies of schizophrenia.The purpose of this study was to determine 1) the reliability of diagnoses of schizophrenia at coronal autopsy and 2) the degree to which the use of different diagnostic instruments for schizophrenia would affect postmortem brain research.Eighty-three subjects, recorded at coronal autopsy as having had schizophrenia, were referred for neurochemistry studies. The diagnoses reported to the state coroner's office were reevaluated by a review of psychiatric case histories by clinicians using semistructured assessment and diagnostic criteria.The application of DSM-III-R, Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC), ICD-10, Schneiderian, and Feighner criteria to the diagnosis of the 83 subjects revealed that 63.9%, 48.2%, 48,2%, 43.4%, and 42.2%, respectively, met the criteria for schizophrenia. Highest concordance was between the RDC and ICD-10 systems, while lowest concordance was between the RDC and Schneider systems.These data suggest that unless carefully reviewed, diagnosis may be a major confounding factor in postmortem studies of brain tissue from subjects with schizophrenia.Diagnosis of schizophrenia. Prediction of short-term outcome.Seven systems for the diagnosis of schizophrenia were compared in their ability to predict short-term outcome at follow-up: with each other, with selected specific symptoms, and with a simple additive composite symptom score. None of the systems nor the symptoms predicted strongly, but DSM-III and Schneiderian First Rank Symptoms and the composite score performed somewhat better than the other predictors.Empirical validation of competing definitions of schizophrenia: a poly-diagnostic study of cognitive impairment in non-affective psychosis.The empirical validation of diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia remains a controversial issue within psychiatry and allied sciences. Most diagnostic criteria are still influenced to a large extent by historical and consensus-based perspectives.A poly-diagnostic approach including a set of 23 operationalized diagnostic criteria were administered to probands with non-affective psychosis (n=169). In addition, participants completed a neuropsychological battery during a stable phase of the illness. Attentional, verbal and visual memory and executive functions were assessed. The control group was composed of 26 demographically matched healthy subjects. Analysis of variance was conducted taking neuropsychological performance as response variables and the 23 binary diagnostic systems as explanatory variables.Four out of the 23 operationalized diagnostic systems for schizophrenia (Feighner, French, Kraepelin and Langfeldt criteria) demonstrated high empirical validity for memory and executive functions scores (medium to moderate effect sizes). These 4 systems resemble classic nosological approaches based upon the 'outcome principle' concept, which suggests that schizophrenia leads to deterioration. However, diagnostic effectiveness of neuropsychological tests for the 23 operationalized diagnostic systems of schizophrenia was low (likelihood ratio <2).Neuropsychological functioning provides empirical validation to operationalized definitions of schizophrenia which are mainly based upon deterioration. It is suggested that some inconsistency of neurobiological studies in schizophrenia might result for using solely current consensus-based diagnostic systems. The implementation of poly-diagnostic strategies could contribute to improve the validity of the schizophrenia construct.McLean-Harvard International First-Episode Project: two-year stability of ICD-10 diagnoses in 500 first-episode psychotic disorder patients.Because clinical and biologic research and optimal clinical practice require stability of diagnoses over time, we determined stability of ICD-10 psychotic disorder diagnoses and sought predictors of diagnostic instability.Patients from the McLean-Harvard International First-Episode Project, conducted from 1989 to 2003, who were hospitalized for first psychotic illnesses (N = 500) were diagnosed by ICD-10 criteria at baseline and 24 months, on the basis of extensive prospective assessments, to evaluate the longitudinal stability of specific categorical diagnoses and predictors of diagnostic change.Diagnostic stability averaged 90.4%, ranking as follows: schizoaffective disorder (100.0%) > mania with psychosis (99.0%) > mixed affective episode (94.9%) > schizophrenia (94.6%) > delusional disorder (88.2%) > severe depressive episode with psychotic symptoms (85.2%) > acute psychosis with/without schizophrenia symptoms = unspecified psychosis (all 66.7%) > acute schizophrenia-like psychosis (28.6%). Diagnoses changed by 24 months of follow-up to schizoaffective disorder (37.5%), bipolar disorder (25.0%), schizophrenia (16.7%), or unspecified nonorganic psychosis (8.3%), mainly through emerging affective features. By logistic regression, diagnostic change was associated with Schneiderian first-rank psychotic symptoms at intake > lack of premorbid substance use.We found some psychotic disorder diagnoses to be more stable by ICD-10 than DSM-IV criteria in the same patients, with implications for revisions of both diagnostic systems.Effect of diagnostic criteria on the ratio of male to female schizophrenic patients.Contrary to earlier epidemiological data, recent evidence points to a significantly greater proportion of men than women among schizophrenic patients diagnosed by current restrictive criteria. In this study, the authors analyzed the effect of using six different diagnostic systems (varying in their stringency) on the male to female ratio of schizophrenia among 387 inpatients. Diagnostic criteria representing a broad conceptualization of schizophrenia, such as the New Haven Schizophrenia Index, consistently yielded equal rates of schizophrenia among men and women. Those diagnostic systems representing more stringently defined schizophrenia, such as the Research Diagnostic Criteria, consistently yielded a male to female ratio significantly greater than the male to female ratio of the total sample.First-rank symptoms and Bleuler's basic symptoms. New results in applying the polydiagnostic approach.By comparing six different operational diagnostic systems (International Classification of Diseases, Diagnostic and Statistical Manual; 3rd ed., Research Diagnostic Criteria, St. Louis criteria, Taylor criteria and Vienna Research Criteria), the data presented in this paper illustrate how attribution to various categories of functional psychoses varies according to the applied algorithms. Bleuler's basic symptoms are obviously considered by all of the compared systems to be more significant for attribution to schizophrenia than first-rank symptoms.Diagnostic evaluation of Schneider first rank symptoms of schizophrenia among three groups of Iranians.Diagnostic agreement of schizophrenia spectrum disorders among chronic patients with functional psychoses.To investigate whether diagnostic agreement across different diagnostic systems improves in a sample of chronic patients suffering from functional psychosis compared to first-admitted patients.Among 353 patients with a history of functional psychosis, a subset of 100 individuals (35 women and 65 men) were randomly sampled and assessed using the Operational Criteria Checklist for Psychotic Illness and Affective Illness (OPCRIT). Based on the OPCRIT diagnoses the subjects suffering from schizophrenia and schizophrenia spectrum disorders according to seven diagnostic systems were identified. Diagnostic agreement was assessed using unweighted kappa-statistics and pairwise concordance rates (CR).High diagnostic agreement of schizophrenia was observed across the ICD-10 and DSM systems (CR >0.70, kappa >0.70), which all had a significantly lower concordance to the St. Louis Criteria (SLC), research diagnostic criteria and Schneider's first rank symptoms (FRS) (0.32< CR <0.66; -0.10< kappa <0.51). Agreement on schizophrenia across all systems was observed for one fourth of the subjects. Elimination of the diagnostic impact of 'co-occurrence of psychotic and affective symptoms' excluded FRS standalone individuals from the sample, increased overall homogeneity and resulted in a dichotomized sample according to SLC (46 positive vs. 47 negative). SLC status could be predicted in 78% of cases by four items relating to family history and psychosocial function previous to the onset of illness. Similarly high pairwise CR were observed for schizophrenia spectrum disorders across all diagnostic systems.This study demonstrates that diagnostic agreement is higher among chronic patients than that observed in subjects with a recent onset of psychosis, although considerable discordance is also observed in this chronic sample. However, the discordance among chronic patients with functional psychosis largely derives from the different emphasis that diagnostic systems place on co-occurrence of psychotic and affective symptoms. This may have serious epistemological consequences, thus underlining the conventional nature of the present schizophrenia diagnoses and the need for biologically founded diagnostic criteria.Schneiderian first rank symptoms in a sample of schizophrenic patients in Egypt.Schneiderian first rank symptoms are included in the most influential operative diagnostic criteria, such as the ICD-10 and the DSM-IV. Many studies have examined their prevalence in the West, but their prevalence in non-Western countries still needs to be explored given that cultural beliefs are so different.The aim of this study is to shed some light on Schneiderian first rank symptoms (FRS) as they occur in patients with schizophrenia in Egypt.Forty-two patients were interviewed, their demographic characteristics studied and FRS elicited. The SPSS computer program was used to analyse the data.The prevalence rate of FRS was found to be 67%, which is similar to previous studies both in the East and the West. The study also showed that demographic variables had no significant relation to the prevalence of FRS except for nationality and social status.Schneiderian first rank symptoms transcend cultural barriers. However, strong cultural beliefs about the influence of supernatural forces on humans should nonetheless be carefully considered in eliciting delusions of control, influence or passivity.Psychotic symptom patterns and the diagnosis of schizophrenia.In comparing 101 psychotic patients subtyped by DSM-III criteria into paranoia, schizophrenia, schizoaffective, and affective disorders, we failed to distinguish them on the basis of delusional and hallucinatory experiences. These 'productive', 'positive' or 'irritative' symptoms--which the literature tends to link with temporolimbic dysfunction--did not appear specifically linked to schizophrenia. By contrast, 'negative' or 'deficit' symptoms--which the literature tends to relate to frontal lobe dysfunction--appeared more specific--especially for the disorganized subtype of schizophrenia. Although these data tend to support Bleulerian over Schneiderian conceptualization of schizophrenia, the heterogeneity of neuropsychological deficits implied in the negative symptom complexes limits the nosologic utility of the rubric of schizophrenia so defined.Factor structure and familiality of first-rank symptoms in sibling pairs with schizophrenia and schizoaffective disorder.Since their introduction as diagnostic criteria by Schneider in 1937, nuclear symptoms have played a key role in concepts of schizophrenia, but their relationship to each other and to genetic predisposition has been unclear.To ascertain the factor structure and familiality of nuclear symptoms.Nuclear (Schneiderian) symptoms were extracted from case notes and interviews in a study of 103 sibling pairs with DSM-III-R schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder.Principal components analysis demonstrated two major factors: one, accounting for about 50% of the variance, groups thought withdrawal, insertion and broadcasting, with delusions of control; and the second, accounting for < 20% of the variance, groups together third-person voices, thought echo and running commentary. Factor I was significantly correlated within sibling pairs.The correlation within sibling pairs suggests that, contrary to the conclusion of some previous studies, some nuclear symptoms do show a degree of familiality and therefore perhaps heritability.A polydiagnostic and dimensional comparison of epileptic psychoses and schizophrenia spectrum disorders.After establishing the validity of the Japanese version of the Operational Criteria Checklist for Psychotic Illness (OPCRIT), we applied it to 58 consecutive patients with epileptic psychoses (index group) and to age- and sex-matched controls with schizophrenia spectrum disorders (control group). Compared with the control group, the index group had a low family history of schizophrenia, high premorbid personality disorder and unemployment, abrupt or acute onset of psychosis, good recovery with single or multiple episodes, and low deterioration from a premorbid level of function. From 9% to 52% of the index group and 38% to 84% of the control group were diagnosed with schizophrenia according to the operational criteria used. The percentages of patients diagnosed with schizophrenia based on various diagnostic criteria in the two groups were similar. In the index group, a diagnosis of schizophrenia was more commonly made among patients with inter-ictal psychosis than among those with post-ictal psychosis. An exploratory factor analysis identified five factor solutions of manic, negative, depressive, vegetative, and positive symptoms. Although positive and negative factor values were lower in the index group than in the control group, the two groups shared a similar factor profile. These results indicate that the difference in symptomatology between the two groups was quantitative rather than qualitative.Prognostic value of initial subtype in schizophrenic disorders.The prognostic value of the subtype diagnosis at the initial episode was investigated in 148 narrowly defined schizophrenic patients. Every initial episode was classified according to multiple criteria: DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the positive/negative dichotomy, and Schneider's first rank symptoms. Patients were followed up on average 23 years later (range 10-50 years). Different aspects of long-term outcome were evaluated (global functioning, social adjustment, negative social consequences). In 93% of the patients persisting alterations were found at the end of the observation time. The influence of the predominant clinical features at the initial episode on various aspects of long-term outcome was found to differ depending on which of the four diagnostic systems was used. The highest power for discrimination was found for the subtypes of DSM-III-R, while the presence of first rank symptoms had no prognostic value. It was found that patients with an initial paranoid or positive episode had a significantly better long-term outcome than patients initially having a disorganised/hebephrenic or catatonic episode. The frequency of negative social consequences was not influenced by the initial subtype, with the exception of permanent hospitalisation.Inter-rater reliability of twelve diagnostic systems of schizophrenia.The present and past symptomatology of 31 chronic schizophrenics was rated by four independent judges, two experienced clinical psychiatrists and two psychiatric residents, in a context more representative of actual clinical practice than most research studies. Ratings were made on 64 symptoms derived from 12 diagnostic systems, based on either live or videotaped interviews for present symptomatology and case records for past symptomatology. Inter-rater reliabilities were higher for present than for past symptoms, and in general did not approach those reported for highly trained raters. There were no differences between live and videotaped interviews. Diagnostic systems differed widely in rater agreement. The most consistent across both past and present symptomatology were the systems of Langfeldt, Schneider, and DSM-III, for which the level of reliability was consistent with other studies.Screening criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia in deaf patients.Confusion about symptoms of schizophrenia in deaf patients leads to misdiagnosis or failure of diagnosis in some individuals. Consequently, we used Schneider's symptoms of schizophrenia, the International Pilot Study of Schizophrenia's list of discriminating symptoms of schizophrenia, and a symptom checklist from DSM-III to evaluate retrospectively 13 deaf adult schizophrenic patients in whom diagnosis were made using DSM-II. Fifteen signs and symptoms were identified in those schizophrenic patients; six symptoms (poor insight, lability of affect, poverty of content, poor rapport, vagueness, and inability to complete a course of action) are usual in nonpsychotic as well as psychotic deaf patients. The nine "primary" symptoms (loss of ego boundaries, delusional perceptions, restricted affect, illogicality, abnormal explanations, hallucinations, inappropriate affect, remoteness from reality, and ambivalence) are useful screening criteria in the diagnosis of schizophrenia in deaf patients.Schneider-oriented versus Conrad-oriented psychiatric diagnosis in the same German clinic.The Chair of the University Nervenklinik in Homburg/Saar was held by Klaus Conrad from 1949-58 and by H.-H. Meyer, a former pupil and colleague of Kurt Schneider, from 1962-72. As the catchment area and admission policy of the clinic remained substantially unchanged throughout, comparison of the relative proportions of all admissions allocated to different diagnostic categories in 1949-58 and 1962-72 can be used to elucidate the similarities and differences between Conrad's and Schneider's diagnostic criteria. The results of this comparison indicate that Schneider's concept of schizophrenia was broader than Conrad's, and his concept of manic-depressive depression more restricted. More detailed comparisons are complicated by differences in nomenclature and in the varieties of functional mental illness recognized in the two periods. However, it seems that Conrad's concept of mania was wider only when the atypical schizophrenia-like psychoses diagnosed during the Conrad era were added to the Conrad-oriented cases of mania; when this was not done, the Schneiderian concept of mania was broader.Prognostic implications of six alternative definitions of schizophrenia.The ability of six different operational definitions of schizophrenia to identify prospectively patients whose eventual prognosis would be poor was studied using data from a six-year follow-up of a series of 134 patients with functional psychoses. All six definitions were more successful at predicting a poor symptomatic outcome than a poor social outcome. Spitzer's Research Diagnostic Criteria, Carpenter's flexible criteria, and Langfeldt's criteria predicted a poor outcome as well as the original clinical diagnoses and were considerably better than the New Haven criteria, Schneider's first rank symptoms, or the computer program Catego.Clinical polydiagnostic studies in a large Swedish pedigree with schizophrenia.A polydiagnostic computerized diagnostic system for psychosis was used in a Swedish family complex, and 51 patients with psychiatric symptomatology were examined with eight main diagnostic systems for schizophrenia and three systems for schizophrenic subgroups. All patients fulfilled the criteria for schizophrenia according to Taylor et al., 50 according to Carpenter, 41 according to RDC, and 31 of the 51 according to DSM-III and DSM-III-R. The hypothesis that the patients in the Swedish family complex differ from other phenotypes of schizophrenia must be refuted based on the data of the present study.The validity of schizophrenia diagnosis in the Finnish Hospital Discharge Register: findings from a 10-year birth cohort sample.The purpose of this study was to investigate the diagnostic validity of schizophrenia in the Finnish Hospital Discharge Register (FHDR) with a large, epidemiologically representative sample using a multidiagnostic approach (DSM-III-R, DSM-IV, ICD-10), and to find additional criteria that could be used to improve the validity of schizophrenia diagnosis in future register-based research that utilizes the FHDR. The study population consisted of all individuals (n=877) who were born in Helsinki, Finland, between 1 January 1951 and 31 December 1960, and who had had at least one diagnosis of schizophrenia, schizophreniform disorder or schizoaffective disorder in the FHDR. All their available hospital case notes were collected. The total number of subjects for whom case notes were obtained was 806. We used the OPCRIT system (version 3.4) to produce diagnoses according to ICD-10, DSM-III-R and DSM-IV criteria based on the information extracted from the hospital case notes. We examined the distribution of the DSM-III-R, DSM-IV and ICD-10 diagnoses generated by the OPCRIT and calculated the proportion of individuals who received the same diagnosis in the FHDR and in the OPCRIT assessment. The proportion of subjects who received a core schizophrenia spectrum diagnosis (schizophrenia, schizoaffective disorder or schizophreniform disorder) in both the FHDR and OPCRIT assessment varied between 75% (DSM-III-R criteria) and 78% (ICD-10 criteria). Of the subjects with a narrow schizophrenia diagnosis in the FHDR, between 74% (DSM-IV) and 78% (ICD-10) received a diagnosis of schizophrenia in the reassessment depending on the diagnostic criteria applied. Eighty per cent of those who had received a core schizophrenia spectrum FHDR diagnosis after 1982 (vs. 56% of those who had received their last schizophrenia diagnosis in 1982 or before) received a DSM-IV diagnosis of core schizophrenia spectrum disorder. Of the 58 subjects in the sample who had been given at various times diagnoses of both core schizophrenia diagnosis and bipolar I diagnosis in FHDR, 43% received a core schizophrenia spectrum diagnosis according to DSM-IV criteria. The validity of the FHDR schizophrenia diagnosis is acceptable for large-scale register studies and comparable with that of other Nordic registers. Diagnostic validity can be further improved by selecting subjects who have core schizophrenia spectrum disorder as the latest diagnosis, by omitting cases diagnosed before 1982, and by excluding cases with a register diagnoses of both a core schizophrenia spectrum and bipolar I disorder.Long-term course of schizophrenic illness: Bleuler's study reconsidered.The influential 1972 study by Manfred Bleuler on the long-term course of schizophrenic illness has been reconsidered. The authors tested the diagnosis of schizophrenia in all patients and investigated how the distribution of the types of illness course and outcome would change after exclusion of patients whose diagnosis of schizophrenia could not be confirmed by modern diagnostic standards.Clinical charts and Bleuler's research notes on the original sample were assessed, and all patients were rediagnosed with the help of DSM-IV, DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC), Schneider's criteria, and an operationalized version of the criteria of Eugen Bleuler.The diagnosis of schizophrenia was not confirmed in about 30% of the sample; the majority of these patients were rediagnosed with schizoaffective disorder. High diagnostic agreement was found between DSM-IV, DSM-III-R, ICD-10, and RDC; there was much less agreement with Bleuler's and Schneider's criteria. After exclusion of patients whose schizophrenia diagnosis was not confirmed, the proportion of patients with undulating course and recovery slightly decreased, and the proportion of patients with severe end state slightly increased. Nevertheless, the distribution of the types of long-term course did not significantly change, and even among patients with strictly defined schizophrenia, half had an undulating course with remissions and 12%-15% recovered.Schizophrenic illness remains heterogeneous with regard to illness course and outcome even when narrowly diagnosed with the help of modern operationalized diagnostic criteria. Contemporary differentiation between schizophrenic and schizoaffective disorders is prognostically valid.Concurrent validity of the OPCRIT diagnostic system. Comparison of OPCRIT diagnoses with consensus best-estimate lifetime diagnoses.OPCRIT (a suite of computer programs that allow data entry and generate diagnoses according to 12 operational diagnostic systems) is used in a wide range of psychiatric research including both European Science Foundation and NIMH research initiatives in the molecular genetics of mental disorders. We examined its concurrent validity in 100 subjects collected for linkage studies of Bipolar Disorder and Schizophrenia.We compared diagnoses generated by OPCRIT from data rated by two trained clinicians with diagnoses made according to consensus, best-estimate, lifetime procedures by the same two raters according to DSM-III-R and RDC classifications.Good to excellent agreement was achieved between OPCRIT diagnoses and those made by consensus best-estimate procedures.OPCRIT provides a convenient, reliable, rapid and valid approach to polydiagnostic assessment that can be used as an adjunct to conventional (but time consulting) best-estimate consensus diagnostic procedures.Schizophrenia: diagnostic criteria and outcome.The files of a cohort of schizophrenic patients who were admitted to hospital for the first time in their lives in 1963, and who were representative of cases in a large unselected population, were examined , first by exclusion criteria, and then by the diagnostic criteria of Schneider's first-rank symptoms, Feighner et al's criteria, and the New Haven Schizophrenia Index (NHSI). Forty-three such cases were found who were schizophrenic on at least two sets of criteria, and who were followed up in 1977. Examination of the outcome showed no relationship with FRS presence or absence or number of first-rank symptoms, nor with the NHSI score, but did show a relationship to the Feighner et al criteria and an even stronger relationship to a simple score derived from these criteria.The DSM-III concepts of schizophrenic disorder and schizophreniform disorder. A clinical and prognostic evaluation.Consecutive new patients presenting at a Nigerian psychiatric unit over a 14-month period and fulfilling the DSM-III criteria for schizophreniform disorder, (active) schizophrenia and residual schizophrenia were studied. There were no differences between the three groups with respect to background social data. The schizophreniform patients had a lower incidence of previous psychotic episodes. There were no differences between the first two groups with respect to the distribution of PSE symptoms and signs, Schneider's First Rank Symptoms, or severity of psychopathology. Initial clinical outcome, and longer-term clinical and social outcome, assessed 25-38 months after index presentation, was best in the schizophreniform patients and worst in the patients with residual schizophrenia. The findings are consistent with schizophreniform disorder lying on a spectrum of schizophrenic disorders. They also highlight inadequacies in mental health services in Nigeria and other developing countries.Frequency and predictive values of first rank symptoms at baseline among 362 young adult patients with first-episode schizophrenia Results from the Danish OPUS study.To investigate the frequency of the Schneiderian First Rank Symptoms (FRSs) in a representative group of patients with first-episode schizophrenia and to analyse the predictive value of these symptoms in relation to psychopathology, work situation, depression, dependency and admission after 2 years of treatment.547 patients were included in the Danish OPUS trial. A subgroup of these, namely the 388 patients who fulfilled the diagnostic criteria for schizophrenia (ICD-10), was included in this study. Data from SCAN interviews were used to describe the frequency of the different first rank symptoms and to compare the characteristics of the patients with and without FRSs.FRSs were very common among these patients with first-episode schizophrenia. Only 16% reported no FRSs at all. Almost half of the patients had experienced commenting or discussing voices, and more than 40% had experienced loud thoughts. More patients with than without FRSs had some kind of substance abuse. FRSs at baseline did not predict the level of scores in the psychotic, negative or disorganized dimension after 2 years. Having FRSs at baseline was related to a significantly lower number of days of admission during the two-year period, but was not associated with antipsychotic medication or depression after 2 years.FRSs are very common among first-episode psychosis patients, but their predictive value seems to be limited with respect to outcome measures like psychopathology, work or substance abuse. However, FRSs did predict a lower mean of days of admission.A polydiagnostic approach to self-perceived cognitive disorders in schizophrenia.The relationship between the self-perceived cognitive disorders (SPCD) assessed using the Frankfurt Complaint Questionnaire (FCQ) and 21 definitions of schizophrenia was studied in a sample of 118 consecutively admitted patients. The FCQ total score was significantly associated (p < 0.05) with the presence of Schneider's, Yusin's and Present State Examination criteria of schizophrenia. A significant association, in this case negative, was also found between the FCQ total score and the presence of the DSM-III-R criteria of schizophrenia. The results suggest that the SPCDs are more associated with Schneider-related criteria than with chronic or deficit models of schizophrenia. It was also found that the female sex as well as the presence of insight were significantly associated with a greater number of SPCDs.Diagnostic overlap in schizophrenia research: relation to outcome predictors and family history.Five sets of criteria for the diagnosis of schizophrenia were compared on 47 hospitalized patients who fit New York Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC) for chronic schizophrenia. The other diagnostic systems used were the Flexible System. Feighner Criteria, New Haven Schizophrenia Index (NHSI), and Taylor-Abrams (TA) Criteria. The NSHI, the broadest system examined, fit all of the patients studied. In contrast, only 30 patients (63% of the sample) were diagnosed schizophrenic using TA Criteria. When the Strauss-Carpenter prognostic scale was used, patients who fit TA Criteria for schizophrenia did not differ in the prognostic scores from the remainder of the sample. In addition, the two groups did not differ in the familial rate of schizophrenia spectrum disorders. The usefulness of narrow versus broad diagnostic criteria in schizophrenia research is discussed.Heterogeneity of delusional syndromes: diagnostic criteria and course prognosis.In addition to genetic findings and treatment response, the course prognosis is also meant to be a possible validating criterion for diagnosis and diagnostic systems. In our study we used the polydiagnostic approach (i.e. the simultaneous application of various criteria for diagnosing a given disorder to one and the same population) to test the ability of several diagnostic systems to create homogeneous groups regarding the course (episodic/chronic). We applied Schneider's FRS, ICD-9, DSM-III, Spitzer's RDC and the Vienna Research Criteria to 90 patients with the diagnosis of delusional syndrome (aside from any nosological classification), who underwent 6-9 years of follow-up. At the index examination, schizophrenia was most frequently diagnosed with Schneider's FRS, which apparently encompasses a very heterogeneous group of patients regarding psychopathology and course. Diagnostic systems which allowed the diagnosis of affective disorders despite the presence of mood-incongruent delusional symptomatology (DSM-III, RDC, Vienna Criteria) or offered the diagnosis of schizoaffective disorder (DSM-III, RDC) succeeded in separating subgroups with an episodic course on a statistically significant level. In ICD-9 this significance appeared only after exclusion of the schizoaffective cases from the group of schizophrenias. Our data thus uphold the old rule of thumb that affective symptomatology apparently has a very high prognostic value regarding the course of the illness and is in this respect superior to productive symptomatology (such as delusions and hallucinations), still taken to be pathognomonic for schizophrenia by some of the diagnostic criteria under study. This aspect warrants further investigation and should be taken into account in the development and improvement of diagnostic manuals (e.g. ICD-10, DSM-IV).The polydiagnostic interview: a structured interview for the polydiagnostic classification of psychiatric patients.A structured interview (PODI) for the polydiagnostic evaluation of affective and schizophrenic disorders is presented. The interview includes elements of the Structured Clinical Interview for DSM-III (SCID) and of the Present State Examination (PSE). The central idea of this interview is to break down complex criteria into their elements, to assess a wide area of such elements, and to recombine them by a computer program according to different algorithms that are included in a greater number of operational diagnoses. Reliability data will be presented which show sufficiently high kappa and Yule coefficients for a selected set of diagnostic criteria for depressive, manic and psychotic disorders. The applicability of the PODI was established in about 180 interviews.Prognostic validity of the cycloid psychoses. A prospective follow-up study.In a prospective 4-year follow-up study, 26 out of 31 patients initially diagnosed as cycloid psychoses were investigated (anxiety-happiness psychosis n = 15; confusion psychosis n = 8; motility psychosis n = 3). Patients were independently interviewed by two clinical researchers. 61.5% showed one or several 'first-rank symptoms' according to Schneider. In addition, the SADS-LA was applied for RDC and DSM-IIIR diagnoses. According to these classification systems most of the patients were diagnosed as schizophrenic or schizoaffective. Personal interview as well as application of the Strauss-Carpenter Outcome Scale indicated a highly favorable clinical outcome, i.e. lack of affective or behavioral defective states in literally all patients of the study. These results justify the distinction of the cycloid psychoses as a nosological entity in general and--less convincingly--of the three subtypes of cycloid psychoses.The predictive validity of a diagnosis of schizophrenia. A report from the International Study of Schizophrenia (ISoS) coordinated by the World Health Organization and the Department of Psychiatry, University of Nottingham.Outcome is important in the validation of psychiatric diagnosis, as most disorders lack clinicopathological correlates. We describe the predictive validity of four definitions of schizophrenia (DSM-III-R, ICD-10, ICD-9 and CATEGO S+), in a representative cohort of patients selected during their first episode of psychosis.Each definition of schizophrenia was applied to 99 patients. Their respective ability to predict 13-year outcome (Global Assessment of Functioning scales) was assessed.DSM-III-R and ICD-10 diagnoses of schizophrenia have high predictive validity for long-term outcome, and both provide relatively stable diagnoses. ICD-9 is reasonably good at predicting disability, but not symptoms, and CATEGO S+ showed no predictive validity. Adding six-month duration criteria to ICD-10, ICD-9 and CATEGO S+ improved their predictive validity, and removing the six-month duration criterion from DSM-III-R commensurately reduced predictive validity.Modern diagnostic systems (DSM-III-R and ICD-10) have high predictive validity, and are superior to ICD-9. The six-month duration criterion of DSM-III-R schizophrenia accounts for its predictive validity and stability over 13 years, but restricts its use in first-episode studies. The one-month duration criterion of ICD-10 is less restrictive, without major compromises in predictive validity or stability.Acute psychotic reactions in Caribbean-born patients.A prospective study of patients with religious delusions identified 24 West Indian and West African patients. Those who had none of Schneider's first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia (principally West Indians) differed from those who did by virtue of early religious commitment, life-long religious experiences, an acute admission precipitated by social events, a greater chance of having their diagnosis changed, less than 10 different PSE syndromes, the absence of 'twentieth-century' delusions, and the presentation of malevolent witchcraft as the sole explanation of the episode. It is suggested that this group can usefully be considered as demonstrating an acute psychotic reaction of the type previously described in Africa and the Caribbean.Schizophrenia in ICD-10: a field trial of suggested diagnostic guidelines.A tenth version of the International Classification of Diseases (ICD-10) is currently being prepared by the World Health Organization, who called for field trials of suggested guidelines. A field trial of the guidelines for the diagnosis of schizophrenia is presented. There is a consistency with ICD-9-based diagnosis. Schneider's First-Rank Symptoms (FRS) acquire special importance in the suggested guidelines, but caution is necessary in detecting these symptoms in cultures in which socioculturally shared beliefs bear a resemblance to FRS.Outcome of schizophrenia in India using various diagnostic systems.A group of 112 patients diagnosed to be suffering from schizophrenia according to ICD-9 concept of this disorder were followed-up for a period of 18-30 months. Five diagnostic systems for schizophrenia: CATEGO, Research Diagnostic Criteria, Feighner's Criteria, DSM-III and Schneider's First Rank Symptoms were also applied to the study group at the beginning of the investigation. The outcome was assessed in the areas of clinical improvement, course, severity of illness and work. The course of the disorder and outcome in various definitions did not reveal significant variability though patients diagnosed to be schizophrenics according to DSM-III tended to display more psychopathology and impaired work efficiency at the time of follow-up.The reassessment of chronic patients previously diagnosed as schizophrenic.Sixty-one outpatients with clinical diagnoses of schizophrenia or schizoaffective disorder were systematically reevaluated with a structured historical diagnostic interview, the Schedule for Affective Disorders and Schizophrenia-Lifetime Version, and with a review of their charts. Research diagnoses were then constructed by applying Research Diagnostic Criteria (RDC) to the interview data and seven diagnostic systems to the chart data. Of the 61 patients, 43 (70.5%) were again recognized to be schizophrenic by the RDC applied to the interview data and 39 (63.5%) met chart criteria. Fifty-one patients (83.6%) were rediagnosed as schizophrenic by at least one of these approaches (excluding the NHSI chart criteria). There was, however, great variation in rediagnostic assignment because of variations in the diagnostic criteria and chart data. Many of the patients who did not meet criteria for schizophrenia met criteria for affective disorder. Patients were assigned to one of four categories according to whether interview or chart rediagnosis was positive or negative for schizophrenia. This categorization was used to search for factors that might account for patients who did not receive a rediagnosis of schizophrenia.The diagnostic status of first-rank symptoms.In the International Statistical Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision(ICD-10) and Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorder, Third and Fourth Edition(DSM-III-IV), the presence of one of Schneider "first-rank symptoms" (FRS) is symptomatically sufficient for the schizophrenia diagnosis. Yet, it has been claimed that FRS may also be found in the nonschizophrenic conditions, and therefore, they are not specific or diagnostic for schizophrenia. This review was made to clarify the issue of diagnostic specificity.(1) A critical review of FRS studies published in English between 1970 and 2005. (2) A highlight of the 5 most frequently cited studies identified in the Web of Science. (3) Theoretical implications of the epistemological issues of FRS.The reviewed studies do not allow for either a reconfirmation or a rejection of Schneider's claims about FRS. The sources of disagreement between the studies are (1) including or excluding acute patients with potential degradation of consciousness; (2) assessing or not the phenomenological context; (3) assessing patients in different stages of their illness evolution; and (4) differential emphasis on mood symptoms and history of psychiatric symptoms.Both DSM-IV and ICD-10 emphasize FRS to a degree that is not supported by the empirical evidence. Until the status of FRS is clarified in depth, we suggest that the FRS, as these are currently defined, should be de-emphasized in the next revisions of our diagnostic systems. Future studies aiming at validation of FRS as diagnostic features need to apply a phenomenological perspective and include a homogenous group of patients across a wide spectrum of diagnoses.A study of Schneider's first-rank symptoms of schizophrenia in Nigerian patients.A prospective evaluation of Schneider's first-rank symptoms in 56 Nigerians with RDC schizophrenia gave a prevalence of 73%. The presence of first-rank symptoms was unrelated to schizophrenic subtypes, duration or severity of illness. While some of the symptoms correlate with age of patients, the pattern of inter-correlations among them supports previous views about their empirical heterogeneity.Subtypes in schizophrenic disorders: frequencies in long-term course and premorbid features.The subclassification of schizophrenic disorders according to four diagnostic systems (DSM-III-R, ICD-10, the positive vs. negative dichotomy and Schneider's first rank symptoms) was compared over the long-term course of the disease in 148 narrowly defined schizophrenic patients. A total of 595 episodes were classified over a mean observation period of 23 years (range 10-50 years). Initially, paranoid/positive subtypes predominated, while later in the course episodes fulfilling the symptomatological criteria of residual/negative subtypes became more frequent. Disorganised/hebephrenic and catatonic subtypes were found to be rare. Some premorbid features were investigated as non-symptomatological validators for subclassification. Significant differences were found with regard to age at onset. Patients whose first episode was paranoid or positive had the highest age at onset. Patients with initial disorganised/hebephrenic or "residual" episodes had the most unfavourable premorbid social adjustment, even when the influence of age at onset was discounted. The diagnostic systems investigated showed similarities and differences as a result of the underlying concepts. Methodological implications are discussed.